PART TWO





A Note to the Reader


			Yoga—literally, union—refers essentially to a science of transformation. If Part One of this book focused on the building blocks of karma, Part Two trains the spotlight on the technologies of transforming karma. It introduces you to the basics of karma yoga—the science of transforming memory into choice, passivity into dynamism, identity into possibility, sleepwalking into awakening.

			Human conditioning, as we have seen, runs deep on the levels of body, mind, and energy. Merely addressing karma on one level—the mental or physical to the exclusion of the rest, for instance—will not work beyond a point. The swiftest and most effective path to joy and freedom is to address karma on all three levels—the physical, the psychological, and the energetic.

			While Part One addressed the what of karma, Part Two is for those who want to address the how. It is for those who want to know how to decondition the body; how to rewrite the repetitive and unoriginal life narratives authored by the mind; how to conquer the unconscious blocks and uncontrolled oscillations in the energy system in order to harness its transformative potential.

			 			This book is about demystifying concepts, but not about denying them their mystery. It is about peeling away needless arcana. But it is not about oversimplifying complex truths. So if the discussion around the energy section begins to seem esoteric in parts, let that not dishearten you. Think of it as a reminder of the complexity of the yogic science—a complexity that is within your grasp, too, the deeper you delve into the subject.

			Karma yoga works in three ways: It is a means to generate good karma for oneself. It offers a way to distance oneself from the oppressive aspects of one’s karmic inheritance. And it is a means of shedding karma and moving toward one’s ultimate liberation from cyclical existence. All these three possibilities are available to the karma yogi, the committed practitioner of the alchemy of well-being.

			The approach here is more practical than in Part One. This explains the many Sadhana segments you will encounter along the way. However, let me reiterate that yoga is too subtle and refined a system to be imparted in words alone. It is a system that requires trained teachers, a controlled environment, and a high level of discipline on the part of the student. This part of the book can never be a substitute for a yogic initiation. However, it does offer several possibilities for self-experiment that can get even the uninitiated started on a journey of freedom and discovery.





SIX


			Karma Yoga




SUTRA #6

				In losing awareness of self is the trap of karma. The hunter becomes the hunted, the architect becomes the bonded laborer, the creator becomes creation. A spider trapped in a web of its own making is a tragedy.





The Crippled Fox and the Generous Lion


				It happened.

				On a certain day, a man was seized by a spiritual thirst. In those days, when you were spiritually thirsty, you went to the forest. (Today, of course, that would be difficult, given that there isn’t much forest around!)

				So this man went deep into a nearby forest and found a tree, under which he sat cross-legged and began intoning the sacred syllable aum.

				Now, you can do aum for only so long. After that, the stomach has its own aum, which asserts itself periodically! Each time his stomach growled, the man would go to town for a meal. He would then come back and resume his austerities.

				 				One day, he returned after his meal and sat down on a rock. He was about to resume his chanting when he noticed a fox. It had lost both its forelegs but was still well-fed and healthy. This struck the man as distinctly odd. In a jungle, governed by the law of the survival of the fittest, it was strange to find a disabled but healthy animal. How had this fox managed to survive?

				The man looked at it with some surprise. After a while, he resumed his practices.

				That evening, while meditating, he heard the growl of a lion. He promptly forgot his aum and clambered up a tree.

				A lion came by with a large chunk of meat in its mouth. To the man’s amazement, the lion walked up to the crippled fox, dropped it in front of him, and walked away. The fox began tucking into his dinner.

				The man looked on in disbelief. The same practice went on day after day. The man could not believe his eyes. A crippled fox being fed by a generous lion! This was a miracle.

				“This has to be a message from God,” he thought. “What is God trying to tell me?” He struggled with that question for a while, and then it dawned on him. When even a crippled fox was being fed in the jungle by a generous lion, why should he keep running to town in search of food? Surely God wanted him to trust he would be provided for and wanted him to focus on what really counted—his spiritual practice.

				So the man changed his strategy. For the next three days, he kept up his aum practice without stirring from his spot. By the fourth day, he was considerably weakened; by the fifth day, he could barely stay conscious; by the seventh day, he was gasping for life, caught in the throes of death.

				 				A yogi happened to be passing this way. Hearing these noises, he found the man and asked, “What happened to you? Why are you in this condition?”

				“Because a divine message came to me. I obeyed it, and see my plight!” groaned the man.

				“What divine message?”

				And so the man related to the yogi the entire story of the crippled fox and the generous lion. “So tell me, yogi,” gasped the man, “was this a divine message or not?”

				The yogi said, “Yes, of course this was a divine message. But why did you choose to imitate a crippled fox rather than a generous lion?”

				And this is exactly what we have done to our understanding of karma!

				We have always had a choice: between inclusive action and paralyzed volition, between intelligent dynamism and pathetic fatalism. Why do we so often choose the latter?

				When we say “Our life is our karma,” it means that our life is of our making. What incredible freedom this spells! And yet what devious ways we have found to absolve ourselves of that responsibility. The moment we absolve ourselves of responsibility, our life resembles that of the crippled fox rather than that of the generous lion.

				In most cultures of the world, people have been told that God determines the course of their life. They must therefore look up to God. But in the East, we said there is nothing to look up to. In a round planet that is spinning, what is up anyway? Your karma was created by you, and it is knowingly or unknowingly being created by you every moment of your life. Karma is, therefore, an invitation to look within, not upward.

				Once you understand that you are a hundred percent responsible for your life, you will naturally choose to live consciously, rather than unconsciously. An unconscious life seems to be easy because you don’t have to do anything other than live by your patterns and compulsions. But an unconscious life will not unfold the way you want it to. It is at the mercy of the caprices of your compulsions. A conscious life, on the other hand, will unfold in the best possible way for you.

				 				Most people live in states of great inner tumult because they believe a God up there or others around them are responsible for their lives. However, the moment you see “My ability to respond is limitless,” things settle. You have now shifted the source of creation from heaven to within. Now it doesn’t matter whether you have confirmed tickets to heaven. Once you know the source of life is throbbing within you, those tickets are quite irrelevant!

				The significance of karma is that it means that none of your identities—derived from beliefs, ideologies, religions, and systems of morality—are absolute. All of them are capable of constant evolution.

				Indeed, of all the crimes that human beings have committed against one another and every other creature, the idea of heaven is the worst of all, because the assumption is that life happens at its best elsewhere, not here and now. Karma means that you are capable of being at your best and doing your best in this very lifetime. It implies a movement toward your ultimate well-being. It means you are capable of being in heaven, in the lap of the divine within yourself, right now.

				Now you may ask, If karma means taking complete responsibility, what is grace? What is the role of the divine in our lives? Is karma a denial of God?

				No, it is not. Let us look at this closely. What do we mean when we use the word divine?

				By the divine we mean the source of creation.

				Where is this source?

				 				Within you.

				Only because you are life are you capable of wondering about the source of life.

				So the question is, Are you going to rest content knowing only the skin, flesh, and bone that make up your physical form, or are you going to seek the very source of creation within you?

				If you know only the physical, you will live in a particular way. If you know the mental and emotional dimensions of your life, you will live a deeper life. But if you touch the very source of life, you are available to grace. Your entire life becomes divine.





Walking Alone


				The one thing every seeker needs to remember is that the inner journey can only be undertaken alone. Once this realization dawns, it marks the birth of spirituality. This realization is sometimes scary for those who are used to living in groups, to making collective life decisions. Yes, you can walk together in the outside world, but in the inner world, everybody walks alone.

				It happened.

				A yogi was walking through the forest. He was suddenly accosted by a highway robber. This was a notorious robber with a reputation for looting and murder.

				He was about to strike the yogi when the yogi asked, “Why are you accumulating these terrible karmas? What for?”

				“I have to support my family,” said the robber. “I am responsible for my wife, my children, my old parents. I have to kill you.”

				“If you are doing this for their sake,” said the yogi, “it is also time you found out if somebody is willing to carry the burden of your karma. Please go home and find out. Tie me up to this tree, so I cannot escape. Just go home and find out for yourself who is willing to carry your karma.”

				 				So the highway robber went home. He said to his family, “I support you by killing people and looting them daily. Will you support me by sharing my karma?”

				His father said, “Nothing doing! I am your old father; it is your business to take care of me. How you take care of me is your karma.”

				He went to his mother. She said the same thing. He went to his wife and children. They said the same thing. “It is your duty to take care of us. How you take care of us is your problem. Why would we share the karma of a murderer?”

				Disillusioned, the man came to the yogi and fell at his feet. “You were right. Everyone is willing to partake of the rewards of my karma. But no one is willing to share responsibility for the adverse consequences of my actions.”

				Karma cannot be distributed democratically. While there is a dimension of collective karma—or kula vedana—there is also the Allotted Karma that every person has to work out. Whether it is worked out with meditation or love, with awareness or ecstasy, doesn’t matter. The realm of individual responsibility exists, and it cannot be evaded.

				It is true that separateness or individuality is fundamentally a myth. However, as long as a person is invested in this myth, the karmic bondage remains. The greater the investment, the greater the karmic bondage. In moments of great devotion, however, when the level of investment is low and an individual’s personality has almost dissolved, it is possible for the veil of karma to be lifted.

				It is said that when saints like Jesus and Guru Nanak (the founder of Sikhism), Buddhist masters, and innumerable yogis walked the earth, people were cured of their ailments just by touching their garment. An enlightened master can certainly create the possibility for a person’s karma to dissolve faster. What would happen in a hundred lifetimes could be worked out in a few minutes. The presence of these masters could, therefore, have created an opportunity for these afflicted people’s karmas to dissolve more swiftly. It is also possible on rare occasions for a master to take on an individual’s karma, but most of the time the karmic allotment—even if put on fast-forward—still has to be worked out by the individual.

				 				As long as you consider yourself to be an individual, you cannot pass the buck. Your karmas are your own.





The Way Out of the Karmic Web


				As we have seen earlier, the yogic system tells us that every human being is composed of five bodies: the physical body, the mental body, the energy body, the etheric body, and the bliss body. Karma is primarily imprinted on the first three levels. If we address the first three levels, we can attain a state of extraordinary freedom from the karmic labyrinth.

				Many people speak of freedom, but have no clue that they are getting more and more deeply entrapped in their own karmic maze. Despite being gifted with phenomenal levels of intelligence, they have forgotten the way out of this self-created web.

				In losing awareness of self is the trap of karma. The hunter becomes the hunted, the architect becomes the bonded laborer, the creator becomes the creation. A spider trapped in a web of its own making is a tragedy!

				It happened.

				On a sunny afternoon, Shankaran Pillai decided to go fishing. He took a case of beer to drink because it was a particularly hot day. As he waited to get lucky, he started sipping beer. Fishing is a patience game, but most people don’t know how to wait. As Shankaran Pillai waited, he consumed can after can of beer. The afternoon wore on. The hot sun and the beer made him drowsy.

				 				All of a sudden, a big fish bit the bait and tugged at his fishing line. A drowsy Shankaran Pillai, who was sitting at the very edge of the riverbank, slipped and fell over into the water.

				A small boy and his father were passing by. The little boy turned to his father and said, “Daddy, look! Is the man fishing the fish, or the fish manning the man?”

				Look at your own life and answer this question as honestly as you can.

				Are you running your own life, or is it running you?

				You have pursued so much for your well-being: your home, your business, your car, your spouse, your child, your club membership. But look back now and see: have you caught the fish, or has the fish caught you?

				It is time to stop the charade. There is only one way out of the spider’s web. And it is the age-old journey from unawareness to awareness, from compulsion to consciousness. The journey known to the greatest yogis and mystics all over the world. The journey back to who you are.

				The yogic tradition has long had a term for this: karma yoga.





Karma Yoga


				What exactly is karma yoga?

				It is the process of using your karma as a process to liberate yourself.

				The logic of karma yoga is simple. Every single activity you engage in can be used as a process of entanglement or as a process of liberation. If your activity is used as a process of entanglement, it is karma. If you use the same activity as a process of liberation, it is karma yoga.

				 				However, the misconceptions about karma yoga are many. A great many people use the term freely and erroneously. It is time to clear the many fallacies that have distorted human understanding and that have created over the years more confusion than clarity, more heat than light.

				Let’s start with the first misconception.

				Many believe that karma yoga means unrelenting action. This is untrue.

				Karma yoga is not about being busy. It is not about being in constant doer mode. It is instead about engaging in the kind of activity that frees you, about performing the kind of action that leads you to your own higher nature, toward your freedom.

				There is also a widespread premise that karma yoga means social service; that a karma yogi is a do-gooder. This is yet another myth. Mere service is not karma yoga. Karma yoga has nothing to do with what type of action you perform, but rather how you do it. Even good deeds can be performed compulsively, rather than consciously. This can lead to entanglement rather than liberation. It is the how that makes the difference. It is the volition that counts.

				If action creates bondage, it is karma. If action creates freedom, it is karma yoga. If you perform action miserably, it is karma. If you perform action joyfully and effortlessly, it is karma yoga.

				It happened.

				On a certain day, three men were working on a site. A passerby came and asked the first man, “What are you doing?”

				The man looked up and said, “Hey, are you blind? Can’t you see I’m cutting stone?”

				The passerby went to the second man and asked the same question.

				“What do you think I’m doing?” growled the second man. “I’m trying to earn my living. I need to fill my belly.”

				 				The passerby went to the third man and asked again, “What are you doing here?”

				The man stood up in great joy. “I’m building a glorious temple!”

				All three men were doing the same work. For the first man, his work was simply cutting stone. For the second, his work was simply a means to eke out a livelihood. For the third, his work was an opportunity to create something beautiful that he cared for deeply. The how is the pivotal issue.

				Every single act in your life can be like this. It is not the content of your life that matters. It is the context of your life that does. So becoming a karma yogi does not mean you have to give up whatever you are doing right now. It means you do it with wholehearted involvement and, in the process, help create a more joyful world wherever you go.

				The problem with today’s world is that we have created rigid ideas of right and wrong. When our minds are so full of hierarchy, it is impossible to be wholeheartedly involved in any action.

				When my daughter was twelve years of age, she came to me, a little troubled. I gave her just one guidance: “Never look up to anyone; never look down on anyone.” If people practiced this simple sadhana, they would see everything just the way it is. If you look up to someone, you will exaggerate their positive qualities; if you look down on someone, you will exaggerate their negative qualities. But if you simply look—not for something, but just look—you will see things just as they are. Now your ability to navigate your way through life is greatly enhanced.

				Have you ever walked on a level surface, expecting to find a step before you? The very expectation of a step makes you lose your balance! This is what it means to walk through life in a make-believe landscape that bears no relation to reality. Even if you’re on flat land, you’re out of balance!

				 				The moment you say something is superior and something inferior, an entire mechanism of like and dislike, attachment and aversion, is set in motion. But when you see things with a certain inner equipoise, you will find an enhancement in every aspect of your life, whether it is managing a corporation or managing your family.

				This brings us to the next fallacy about karma yoga. Karma yoga is usually interpreted as doing one’s duty. This again is utterly false. Now, this may sound outrageous, but let me say it: there should be no such thing as duty in this world. Duty is tyranny. The very idea was concocted by people with vested interests.

				Think about it. Every idea of duty comes from someone with an expectation. The rulers tell you what your duties should be toward them; the ruled tell the rulers what their duties should be toward them. Parents keep trying to remind children about their filial obligations; children keep trying to remind parents about their parental obligations. Husbands want wives to remember their spousal duties, and wives want husbands to remember theirs.

				There is nothing as unbearable as someone doing something for you because they believe it is their duty. The sanctimony of it can make it intolerable. If you are too dutiful, you will die of its burden and people around you will die of boredom! If you have love for something, you do it; if you have no love, it is better to simply desist from action. Doing something miserably or self-righteously is not a contribution to life. When your activity is such suffering, you will create much suffering around you. If you can work joyfully, you should do it twenty-four hours of the day. If you cannot, it is better you stop. The planet is full of miserable people working hard and manufacturing more misery in the process, both for themselves and for everyone else.

				The idea of duty comes from the ethical and moral systems we have created in case our humanity fails. These are fallback systems. But as a guru, I want every individual’s humanity to be active every moment of their lives, rather than work on a fallback system that mimics humanity but is actually a phony substitute.

				 				If all the 7.8 billion people on this planet in 2021 grew very industrious all of a sudden, this planet would be finished in the next twenty years! Thankfully, fifty percent of the people are lazy. And it is that fifty percent who have saved the world! This is an unfortunate state of affairs. It should have been the intelligent and the active who are saving the world, rather than the other way around. But, regrettably, too many miserable duty-adherents are actually wrecking the world by being busy all the time!

				Karma yoga is not a holier-than-thou adherence to duty. Instead, it is about making your entire life an offering. Only when action is performed like this does karma create no bondage. The world is full of people consciously trying to awaken love or spirituality in others in some way or the other. Most often this is done with great attachment to a self-image of being a compassionate or noble person. With such attachment, action is entangling. Only if there is a natural sense of offering can karma be elevating for the doer.

				So the inevitable question is, If duty is irrelevant, does it mean you can do whatever you want?

				Yes, it does!

				But there is a caveat: whatever you do, there is a consequence. If you are willing to joyfully take the consequences of your action, go right ahead. But if you are going to cry over things when they turn unpleasant, it is best you regulate the action and act with some sensitivity and foresight.





Approaches to Karma Yoga: Awareness and Abandon


				Karma can be shed in two ways: either by acting with awareness or by acting with total abandon. If you can do it with both, you are liberated. These are the two approaches to karma yoga. But without these two, everything that you do is an accumulation of karma.

				Abandon is one of the most difficult qualities to find in the world today. The level of inhibition that people live with is truly amazing. It is responsible for several of the diseases—both physical and psychological—we see around us.

				I often ask people, How many of you have grown up in families where you heard your parents laughing many times a day? Most of the time people are dead serious because they are burdened by this dreadful duty of having to bring up their children right.

				Now, when large numbers of people grow up like this, exposed all the time to fear, anxiety, and tension, they naturally grow up inhibited. It may not be spelled out for them, but children pick up the fine print very easily: that it is not decent to laugh, to cry, to dance. In fact, what they imbibe is that it is not right to be alive! As adults, they believe that apart from going to an office, working all day, collecting their paycheck, coming home, reproducing, and struggling with their children, nothing else is appropriate.

				Unfortunately, these inhibitions do not allow people to simply sit still. What no one realizes is that sitting still is one of life’s greatest pleasures! If you can sit absolutely still, you will see that just breathing and being alive is the most extraordinary thing in the world. My schedule is a hectic one, but if I get the chance to shut my door and do nothing, that is the most wonderful time in my life. I have no need to read, watch television, or communicate with anyone, or to have even a single thought in my mind. The phenomenon of life is much larger than the phenomena of thought and emotion. When you truly experience life, your world of thoughts and emotions begins to seem puny and inconsequential. Just being alive is the greatest gift of all.

				 				Even for one moment, if you are in deep embrace with creation, the source of creation is not far away. It becomes a living experience for you. But right now, you are not involved with creation; you are enamored of your own limited, self-manufactured creation, which is just a psychological projection. All your miseries, your tensions arise from this small make-believe world.

				How, then, are we meant to live?

				It is quite simple. Whether you walk or dance, work or play, cook or sing, just do it with total attention and awareness. Or else, do it with total abandon. Both ways, you are closer to creation. But if neither awareness nor abandon is part of your life, you are stuck in your own creation. This is a tragic way to live. When a creation of phenomenal exuberance and grandeur is around you, it is calamitous to live in your own cocoon of preoccupation. And the irony is, it is not even a cocoon entirely of your own making; it is molded by ten other people’s opinions of you! Most people don’t even know who they are, but they have opinions about everything else. You are allowing their opinions to dictate the nature of your very existence!

				So what exactly do we mean by awareness?

				First, let us remember that mental alertness is not awareness. Awareness has nothing to do with the logical mind. Nor is it what is commonly being referred to as mindfulness. Awareness emerges from the deepest layer of the human being. This is called chitta, or consciousness without content. Once you are in touch with this deepest layer, awareness happens effortlessly.

				 				It happened.

				Two priests were standing with a signboard that read: The End Is Near. Turn Around Before It Is Too Late.

				A speeding car came along. The driver saw the sign, stuck his head out of the window, yelled “Leave us alone, you religious nuts,” and sped on.

				He turned the corner. The priests heard the hideous screech of tires and a huge crash.

				One of the priests turned to the other and said, “Maybe we should just have the signboard read Bridge Is Out.”

				The problem with spirituality is that wrong signs have been shown to you for far too long. People have talked too much of mental awareness. There is no such thing. Mental alertness is not awareness. Mental alertness will help enhance your ability to survive in this world. The mind is a useful faculty of discernment, essential for survival, but of no existential consequence.

				Awareness is a far deeper dimension. It is not something you do. It is not an action. It is a state of being. It is the way you are. Awareness is inclusiveness, a way of embracing this entire existence. You can set the right conditions for it to happen, but you cannot do it. If you bring the physical, mental, and energy bodies into alignment, there will be room for awareness to blossom. Once that blossoming becomes experiential for you, you explode into the oneness of existence. This is yoga, the ultimate union.

				What about abandon? What does it mean?

				It means that your involvement has become so intense that you are willing to abandon yourself. Most people think the word refers to abandoning someone or something! But this is about abandoning yourself. You are willing to just give up everything that you consider to be yourself.

				 				Now, abandon can certainly happen by simply sitting still, but it is not easy. It takes great awareness to do this in a state of inaction. On the other hand, in intense states of activity—when you are running, dancing, or playing a game—you can give yourself up with total abandon. In such moments, there is a disconnect between your past and you. When you are completely lost or immersed in any activity, the influence of your past karma is no longer upon you. Many sportspersons and artists know this state of immersion, but the frustration is that they are unable to sustain it. Immersive activity can give you a taste of freedom, but it cannot last. Yoga is the science of sustaining that experience.

				Many believe that a state of restlessness is a prerequisite for action. This is absolutely untrue. The paradox is that the basis of activity is in restfulness. Action that is born of restlessness is life-taking, not life-giving. It destroys a human being in the process. If action is performed in such a way that it is not about yourself anymore, you will see that your ability to work is almost limitless. You can be active almost twenty-four hours a day without exhaustion. This is the remarkable thing about karma yoga.

				Now you may ask, What does all this have to do with being spiritual?

				This brings us to yet another fallacy.

				Being spiritual does not mean sitting under a tree half asleep! Being spiritual is not a disability; it is an empowerment. It does not mean limiting your sphere of activity; it means enhancing it. A spiritual person can cook, clean, walk, work, manage a business or a nation, do anything they want, and still be spiritual.

				For such a person, their very life breath is a spiritual process. This could happen if their awareness rises beyond a certain level, if their love transcends certain limitations, if their physicality is very intense, or if the vibrancy of their energies goes beyond a certain level. A spiritual person is one who has found action in inaction, and inaction in action. Spirituality is about dynamism and stillness cohabiting within you to give you a taste of living death all the time.





SADHANA


					A selective involvement is the basis of bondage and entanglement. Here is a simple sadhana toward your liberation. From this moment onward, be consciously involved with everything around you: the food you eat, the water you drink, the earth you walk upon, the air you breathe, the people around you. If you find this difficult, think of a person whose presence evokes the noblest and sweetest emotions within you. It could be a person living or dead; it could be Jesus or Buddha or anyone else you value most highly in your life. Then try looking upon everyone and everything around you with the same gaze. If this is hard to sustain, give yourself hourly reminders on your cell phone. A simple chant or mantra or tune could remind you of this. This will help establish you in the practice.

					Be equally involved with everything without any distinction. Put away all hierarchies. If God comes before you, the same involvement; if a frog comes before you, the same involvement. (No, I am not talking of that frog that turns into a prince upon a kiss; just a frog!)

					It may seem challenging at the start. But once you manage it, you will see that in just twenty-four hours you are capable of becoming an unimaginably blissful human being.





Renouncing the Fruit of One’s Actions


				When I was once asked what my mission in life was, I said, “Nothing. I’m just fooling around.” My interlocutor was shocked. Fooling around? Was I being flippant? What did I mean?

				And, yet, it is true. All my yoga programs, talks, conferences, and outreach projects don’t mean a thing to me. Then why am I doing my damnedest to make sure people learn yoga and human well-being, you may ask? When I say it doesn’t mean a thing to me, I am not saying it is useless. I know it is useful. I know this is what humanity needs right now. But personally, it does not mean anything to me. At the same time, I will do it as if my life depends on it—and if it costs me my life, I will still do it. My involvement is on at full throttle all the time.

				Does this sound paradoxical? Actually, it is not. The problem is just that most people cannot do something unless they are personally invested in it. “This is the most important cause in the world,” they think. Or “God has chosen me to do this work.” People are always looking for their mission in life. What they never realize is that this is the way you build your karma! God has ordained no one. It is people themselves who build a false sense of self-importance by claiming that their work is divinely ordained. If they learned to plunge into something that does not mean anything to them with absolute involvement, they would find their karma disentangling in no time.

				The basis of karma yoga is to be involved in the process, not the product. Whether you approach your karma through awareness or abandon, the point is to immerse oneself in the journey and not be anxious about the destination.

				Start by looking at a practical example. Let us say someone is an accountant. The fact that they go to an office and count numbers does not in itself entangle them. But other reasons might impel them to work: the prestige of working in a particular firm, the financial benefits, the lifestyle it affords them, the social access it allows them. So gradually they might find they are no longer going to work because they love to count numbers, but because of the fruit of their actions. Of course, everyone deserves to be paid, to eat well, and to live well. But the question is this: If all those benefits were not there, would we still work with the same intensity and involvement?

				 				You do not need to be a scriptural scholar to understand this. Just observe yourself. You will see that whenever you perform an action without expectation, your experience of life will be qualitatively different from the times when you perform it with expectation. A good example is to consider the times when you have played a game that you enjoyed. You plunged yourself into the game with passion and involvement, and of course you played to win, but you were not devastated if you lost. It is because you enjoyed the process that you were willing to play again. If you are very happy playing the game, the result does not really matter. If you are able to carry this awareness into every aspect of your life, your experience of life will be drastically altered. Above all, a game is won only when you play it well, not because you desire to win.

				Since it is not easy for everyone to cultivate enough awareness to drop the fruit of their action, every culture in the world has emphasized the importance of love. When you have a deep sense of love toward somebody, it becomes much easier to drop the consequence of your action.

				In this regard, women are definitely better karma yogis than men. Think of all the women who have worked quietly, tirelessly, anonymously down the centuries, without any prospect of financial reward or fame. Many of them worked full-time to look after their families, to make sure everyone was fed and clothed and loved, without thinking for a moment about what was in it for them. Unfortunately, we have devalued the contribution of these generations of unsung women.

				 				Our current education has the effect of creating endless greed, unbridled want. Those who act without expectation of reward would be considered losers in the society we have created for ourselves. Our idea of progress is to want to be like someone else, or else to compete, to outdo others. This madness is the curse of our modern world.

				Karma yoga reminds us that action is never a problem. It is the expectation of the fruit of the action that causes suffering. If you simply enjoy what you do and work at it wholeheartedly, there is no question of suffering at all. You would work joyfully, and your ability to work would be hugely enhanced.

				Only a human being who is utterly blissful would be able to recommend renouncing the fruit of one’s actions. When you are trying to attain happiness by hoping for a certain result from your activity, outside situations will determine whether you are joyful or miserable. This is why I am not impressed by those who endlessly quote the words of Krishna or Jesus or parrot Rama or the Buddha. Repeating a scriptural truth without an inner experience of it is a futile exercise. It will not transform your life in any way.

				But a simple reversal of approach to your life can make all the difference. If you saw your life as an expression of your happiness, rather than as a pursuit of it, you would find you have made a significant paradigm shift. You would effortlessly immerse yourself in whatever you are doing, without any expectation, for the pure joy of the activity.





To Rule or to Serve?


				Human beings have no choice but to act. That is the nature of our lives. But the two alternatives before us are just these: Do we want to rule or do we want to serve?

				Now, I do not mean perform service in some self-conscious, holier-than-thou way. That is more an intensification of the ego than anything else. When I say serve, I mean an act of immersion, not conquest. Every human being wants to have an impact upon the world, but how you leave this impact is the moot point.

				Do not think you are incapable of being a despot. Most people want to rule the world. It is just that because they are half-hearted that they end up ruling only their households! They may not have the capacity, the intensity, the one-pointed focus that is necessary to rule the world. But secretly they wish they could.

				What makes a tyrant different is that their self-image is powerful. They might believe so strongly that they are going to rule the world that sometimes it almost comes true! This is something many human beings have yet to discover for themselves: that if they create a continuous mental focus toward a particular self-image, it will, in fact, come true.

				There is, however, another way to create. It does not entail asking for anything, or even thinking about what needs to happen. Here, things just happen as they are needed. No forethought, no plotting or scheming is required here. Once you choose this approach, all you need to do is to act with tremendous intensity, without wavering for an instant in your focus and determination. Then, one day, you will reach a point where no action is needed. You are capable of acting, but you are not compelled to. You choose to engage with life, but you are no longer entangled by it.

				This kind of action is possible for everyone. But before you arrive at this state, some fired-up action is required. People who have never been on fire will never know the coolness of water. People who have just lived their lives in a lukewarm, half-hearted, sedate manner can never reach a point of transformation. Those who have never known intense action will never be able to move into inaction. Their inaction will simply be lethargy, apathy.

				 				Only the person who is capable of being immersed in work knows the true meaning of rest. This is why at the Isha Centers, as I have said before, you will find many residents engaged in unstinting nonstop work. They are not working at something they enjoy or dislike; they are not working to achieve something; it is simply single-minded, choiceless activity. They are doing it because it is needed, that’s all.

				You will see after rigorous, immersive work that there is suddenly no intention left in you to do anything. Now the real spiritual process unfolds. Only if you have known intense action will you know the bliss of inaction. Once your energies get to a boiling point, it is very easy to transform them and make your life happen in the most harmonious way possible. That is the whole purpose of karma yoga.

				This is also the science of creating a truly powerful being. This is how one who serves is created. Their power is immense, but it is not the power to rule. The power to rule is not a real power, because it can be taken away at any moment. The power that we are talking about here is a power that cannot be taken away. In whatever circumstance or context such a person is placed, there is only one thing they will do.

				Those who seek to rule can work only if they are on their throne. If they are taken off the seat, they become miserable. But those who choose to serve will be undeterred because they are not obsessed with the fruit of their action. If they are in heaven, they will do the same thing; if they are in hell, they will do the same thing. According to Buddhist lore, Gautama the Buddha said he would rather serve in hell than go to heaven because, anyway, he was incapable of suffering. That was his freedom.

				 				This approach releases you from attachment to the fruit of your action. Now the action will happen by itself; it will also dissolve and melt away by itself. You do not have to stop working to be liberated from action; it will happen anyway. You do not have to do anything about it.

				It happened.

				In a Zen monastery, there lived a master who was more than eighty years old. Every day, he worked his heart out in the gardens—a time-honored part of Zen spiritual practice. He had been doing this for years. Now he had grown old and weak, but he refused to stop his work.

				His disciples tried to dissuade him. “Don’t bother with this anymore, Master,” they said. “We are all here. We will do it.”

				But the old master wouldn’t listen. His physical abilities had weakened, but the intensity remained the same.

				So one day his disciples took away his gardening tools and hid them somewhere. He hunted for them in vain. That day he did not eat. The next day, again, his tools were missing, so he did not eat. The third day, no tools once more. He did not eat.

				Now his disciples grew afraid at his refusal to eat. The next day, they replaced the tools in the gardening shed. That day, the old monk worked and ate. In the evening, he gave his teaching: “No work, no food.” And that night he died. The four days of fasting had weakened him considerably. But his teaching was succinct, and he delivered it before he died: no work, no food.

				Now, wherever you put such a man—heaven or hell—his action will remain the same. When you are like this, you are released from the vagaries of the external situation, from the cycles of karma. Merely closing your eyes won’t achieve this. Merely running away and sitting in the mountains won’t achieve this. The moment you open your eyes, the moment you return to the marketplace, reality will come and catch up with you. Karma has to be worked out, but engaging with action with great involvement and intensity, without caring a hoot for it, is the most effective way to work your karma out.

				 				There are various ways to do so. You could be so drunk with blissfulness that nothing matters, or you could fall so deeply in love with someone that nothing matters. Only if you are in states of bliss or love can you work intensely and still not be bothered about the result.





The Meaning of Sacrifice


				The term karma yoga is often seen as closely linked with sacrifice. In every spiritual tradition in the world, the notion of sacrifice has been seen as significant.

				In Sanskrit the word yagna is often translated in English as “sacrifice.” But yagna usually refers, in practice, to certain oblations and rituals that were practiced in ancient India to appease a deity or to placate some forces of nature. However, these rituals were not a sacrifice in the true sense of the word. Giving up something for something else is commerce; giving up something for nothing is a sacrifice.

				The traditional yagna had its own technology and internal logic. It was a process through which you found access to certain forces or deities and sought to enhance your capabilities. These processes are still practiced today in many parts of India. They can help create several health and material benefits.

				However, once you are on a spiritual path, you are not interested in small processes, minor technologies, petty rituals. The very way you live becomes a yagna. This is the deepest meaning of sacrifice. You are not interested in inviting an expert to perform rituals to enable you to manipulate certain forces. Your very life process is an offering.

				 				If even a small percentage of the world’s population becomes meditative, many reap the benefits. A single mango tree can offer fruit to a hundred people. Similarly, when your life becomes a yagna, thousands of people can reap its benefits. Many individuals have done this down the ages.

				At Isha, there are thousands of volunteers and practitioners who have offered their entire lives to a spiritual path with commitment and unwavering focus. Wherever they go, they transform the place, in their own small way, into a yagna bhoomi—a land of sacrifice.

				Do not think of sacrifice as cheerless self-denial. When one’s entire life becomes an offering, it brings its own unique joy. There is a story about an Indian ascetic who went to the United States in the last century. Someone he met there dismissively commented, “As an ascetic, you know nothing about life; you have not tasted wine or slept with a woman. What can you know of life’s experiences?”

				The ascetic calmly replied, “I come from a land of sacrifice. And I know the bliss of sacrifice far exceeds the pleasures of the world. I am not afraid of your pleasures, and I am not denying or denouncing them. But once you taste a deeper joy, these become childish toys, mere sops, minor distractions.”

				This approach was at one time deeply ingrained in the Indian family. It was not perpetuated as a teaching, but as an everyday practice. It was part of the spiritual culture. In a host of different ways, a child grew up observing that the more deeply fulfilling life was about giving, not taking; about serving, not ruling.

				 				My mother, like so many other mothers, was a prime example of this. She never had to say to us “I love you,” because it was so apparent in everything she did. Every morning, after ensuring that her family had eaten, she would take a part of her breakfast and go to the backyard. Here she would feed the ants that lived there. She would never eat without feeding them. Today, modern families would be spraying the backyard with pesticide! But without any self-conscious ecological mission, it was clear to my mother that the ants had as much right to this planet as she had. Every little action in her life had become a yagna.

				For people whose lives have become like this, there is no need to perform any ritual. Their lives have become an expression of love—not love as “I love you” and “you love me,” but as a basic ambience of their interiority. Now their lives are one ceaseless flow of karma yoga, an endless outpouring of their inner joy. No more is needed.





SEVEN


			Karma Yoga and the Physical Body




SUTRA #7

				If you take more karmic load now, when you are well and capable, later you will walk “hands-free”!





“Embodying” Karma


				Let us look at how karma yoga can be practiced on the level of the very first dimension of the self that we are aware of: the physical body. How is the physical body influenced by karmic memory? And how can we use the physical body to be free of the cyclical bondage of karma?

				There are many imperceptible ways in which the karmic structure influences and even distorts the physical body. It is not merely your lifestyle—what you eat, what you drink, what you inhale—that has an impact on your body. The subtlest aspects of your thought and emotion can also influence the physical.

				Start with a simple example. You can usually tell if a person is happy or despondent if you look at their face. If you become more observant, you will find that when disturbed, people actually sit or stand differently. Over time, these postures turn habitual and harden into vasanas, or tendencies.

				 				Now, the mind does different things on different days. One day it is joyful; the next day, it is depressed; the third day, it is stressed. In the process, it is not merely distorting your vision of reality; it is distorting your body as well.

				Think of all the unexpected things that happen on a daily basis that are not in your control. If every little psychological event were to reshape you, you can imagine what a complete distortion you would have become in a few years! The distortion will happen dramatically on an energy level, but it will take time to manifest physiologically.

				If you look carefully at people who have gone through a certain level of emotional stress recently, you will notice small changes in their physical appearance. Often, if the left eye appears slightly smaller than the right, you can be quite certain that they have been going through some emotional distress in the past six months (unless, of course, they were born that way). This is because the left side of the body is always associated in yoga with the emotional life of the human being and the feminine dimension, symbolized by the moon with its cycles of waxing and waning.

				Depending on the nature of the karmic memory, certain parts of the body also behave in certain ways. You might have noticed this about your own body: You may exercise as much as you can, but one muscle in your body is invariably less cooperative than the others. You may check it out with a doctor, or take an MRI. Both will most likely tell you that the muscle is perfectly fine. But your karmic inheritance shapes the skeletal system and musculature in very singular ways. Not every muscle is equally strong or capable.

				 				Again, if you pay close attention to the body, you will see that in some parts of the physical system, you feel no sensation at all. In other words, there are blocks or gaps in the sensory process. This again is because the karma creates its own structure. Based on this karmic information, the physical body takes a particular shape.

				Modern medicine is now well aware of the notion of psychosomatic ailment. This acknowledges the inseparability of the mental and physical bodies. As we have seen earlier, for every sensation, there is a mental fluctuation and a corresponding chemical reaction. The same process also works in reverse. Your physical structure, constitution, and general health are decided by this relentless process.

				This is why yoga works so closely with posture, breath, attitude, and intention. If a certain awareness is brought into these aspects of the self, what is happening in the mind or in the outside world will not affect the body. When you are psychologically distraught, it is particularly important to hold your body consciously, because your karmic substance is trying to shape your body according to its distortions. This explains the enormous care brought into the practice of asanas and pranayama (physical postures and breathing processes) in yoga.





Karma Yoga and Asanas


				How exactly does the physical dimension of yoga—hatha yoga, as it is called—prepare the body to deal with karma?

				The logic is simple. If you cultivate the body in a certain way, it will actually be capable of taking on more of a karmic load. This is how your Accumulated Karma (sanchita) transforms itself into Allotted Karma (prarabdha). The estimation of how much of a karmic load you can take on is done by your own innate intelligence. This intelligence will decide the volume of the stock you should handle for this lifetime, based on your physical and energetic capability and, of course, the karmic balance you have.

				 				Certain cycles play out routinely in human life. Around every twelve years, a shift enables you to take on more of a karmic load. The first twelve-year cycle begins for a child somewhere between 54 and 108 months (that is, between four and nine years of age). Many human beings with a certain sensitivity to life are aware of subtle changes around the cusp of each twelve-year phase; these are times of greater receptivity and greater vulnerability, as well as increased possibility, times when changes in life direction often happen.

				Certain shifts take place during every winter and summer solstice as well. Yogis have traditionally made use of these shifts to increase the amount of karma they can work out. Each cycle of the moon also marks a shift. Those who are into intense yogic sadhana often choose to take on an extra stock of karma on a new-moon day.

				An Aesop’s fable illustrates this point beautifully. Wherever a particular master traveled, his servants followed him, distributing all their luggage among them. Aesop always picked up the heaviest load although he was not a particularly strong man. All the others picked up the lightest loads, because the journey went on for several days. But he always carried the heaviest. One day, his fellow workers asked him, “Why are you doing this? You’re a small fellow. Why are you choosing to carry the heaviest load?”

				He replied, “I pick up the food bundles, which are the heaviest. But the thing about the food bundles is that with every meal, the load becomes less and less. And on the last two days, I walk empty-handed!”

				 				Preparing the body is similar. Through yoga, you prepare the body to take on more of a karmic load. If you take more karmic load now, when you are well and capable, later you will walk “hands-free”! There is nothing to carry, and your life becomes beautiful. This is why the daily schedule in the Isha Yoga Center, as I pointed out earlier, is so rigorous. Physical activity here is intense so as to burn up the Allotted Karma as soon as possible.

				As we know, each human being is born with different allotments of karma. These differences are sometimes apparent even in the mother’s womb. As they grow up, each child is different. Based on this, the child’s innate intelligence decides how much energy is to be allocated to different kinds of activity: physical, mental, emotional, and meditative.

				Now, let us say someone has chosen forty percent for their physical activity, forty percent for their emotional activity, and ten percent each for their intellectual and meditative activity. As a result, they are likely to be a hyperactive mess! If someone like this comes to the center, I would put them into some intense physical activity for a few months. The idea is to burn up the energy allotted for physical activity in their Allotted (prarabdha) Karma. Only after this energy is burned up will they be able to sit quietly and meditate. Most people cannot sit still if they do not first go through some intense activity.

				After that, life becomes much simpler. In any case, the life process itself burns up karma. Simply living and breathing destroys large volumes of it. So after this initial period of fired-up activity, things become easier, as long as people learn not to pick up a new load. In short, at the start, you pick up the heaviest load, but like the food bundle, you know it will go away! On the way, of course, you just make sure you don’t go picking up garbage. The aim is to burn up your allotment, and then enjoy the delights of traveling light.





Common Karmic Frictions


				People experience some common psychological frictions throughout their life—frictions that they call stress. Stress is caused when people try to run their life engine without adequate lubrication. However, some basic yogic practices can offer the needed lubrication for everyone’s life.

				There are more complex levels of friction when the karmic inheritance doesn’t fit well with one’s physical body—for instance, when a certain karmic inheritance does not find the right kind of womb. There are also times when the energy body does not fit well into the physical body. (For some reason, I see more such people in the east coast of America than in the west, or in the northern part of India than in the south. This might be connected to the nature of the land itself, the kind of memory the geography carries, the general atmosphere, or various historical factors.)

				The practice of hatha yoga helps to knead the physical body as well as the entire system (including the karmic system) in a way that smoothes these frictions out. After sustained hatha yoga practice, when you simply sit, you feel no sense of discomfort or stress. Now you can sit still if you want to, as well as negotiate the outside world with great ease and capability.

				Sometimes, because of education, technology, altered social situations, or a certain acquired competence, people are able to attain a state of well-being even though their current karmic situation does not allow it. They live lives that are way beyond their karmic blueprint. In short, they have been placed in far better life situations than their karma allows.

				 				At such times, it is very important to upgrade oneself. Otherwise, you will end up suffering your well-being! This is a common malaise in the world today. Most people’s problem is not a life that is hellish, but a life that is too heavenly! These are the ailments of privilege. People’s systems grow confused because the information within them says one thing, but their life events say another.

				There are ways to address this malaise. Learning to live in gratitude is extremely important because it creates the right attitude. It is also vital to keep upgrading one’s software, as it were. Daily hatha yoga and kriya can help enormously to shed karmic burdens, to upgrade one’s system and adjust one’s software.

				All these yogic sadhanas help one to maintain an inner state that is untouched by the outside. It does not matter whether you are in a palace or a hut: you are the same person. Wherever you are, you do the same thing. When you maintain this equanimity, you will see that situations around you keep getting better. But without karmic upgrading, old compulsions will overwhelm you. They will push you toward certain atmospheres and situations and will not permit you to come to terms with your new reality.





SADHANA


					As we have seen earlier, karma builds itself on three fundamental levels: mental fluctuations, chemical reactions, and sensations. The sensory body is the outermost manifestation of the unconscious mind. The unconscious mind is ruled by an enormous library of karmic memory. This karmic memory keeps manifesting all the time without your permission. Since it is an unconscious manifestation, it makes you look like one big mess. But once you make it conscious, it could be very useful information.

					 					Of the 114 chakras (energy centers) in the human system, the karmic substance concentrates itself around some specific ones. These are related to certain joints and nodes in the body. Chemical deposits build up here over time.

					You may have tried mentally to alter certain simple habits, but you find that within a couple of days, you fall back into them. It is not easy to come out of karmic limitations without simultaneously addressing them on the chemical and physiological levels.

					Hatha yoga is a way of shedding karma with full awareness by moving and stretching the body in various ways. This requires training, however. So here is a simple practice that allows you to move from outer to inner, from body to mind: from outermost sensation, to the chemical deposits within the body, to the mind with its fixed ways of thinking and acting.

					Close your eyes. Raise your hand in front of you to the level of your face, and gently stretch the muscles in your hand, without necessarily moving it mechanically. You will notice lots of sensations. Watch the sensations as keenly as you can. Stretch the hand fully. Become aware of the twitch of every single muscle in your hand.

					If you are able to notice the minutest sensations in your hand, you are ready to do this for the entire body. Continue to keep your eyes closed. Now stretch every muscle in the body and observe the sensations.

					Do not turn this into a mechanical exercise. Allow yourself to make it a subtle dance-like movement, very gently extending every fiber in your body and observing every sensation.

					 					This simple process can help release chemical deposits in the body that have built up over time because of the many shifts and fluctuations in thought and emotion. This is one way of releasing them and, in the process, shedding karmic deposits as well. In the process, the very way you perceive and experience the world will be altered.

					Additionally, this is a useful way to start cultivating awareness. Generally, people inhabit the body in unawareness. Only when they experience a toothache or a backache do they suddenly become aware of the body. The rest of the time, although the body is there, it is inhabited unconsciously. So one of the simplest ways to begin cultivating awareness is to start with physical awareness.

					Awareness does not stop there; it deepens into various other dimensions. But starting with the body—which is a constant factor in your life—offers you an opportunity to practice maintaining your awareness continuously.





Karma and the Elements


				We have seen in Part One how elemental memory plays a role in shaping the human being. Five elements make up the human system, the planet, the solar system, and the entire universe. Without them, there would be no creation.

				With just five elements—earth, water, fire, air, and ether—think of the incredible diversity of life. We see millions and millions of manifestations around us, and no two individuals are ever the same. What makes this extraordinary diversity possible? It is the fact that the elements are highly receptive and have the capacity to acquire memory. Over time, a layer of information—or what we might call karmic substance—gathers on each of these elements. Without these layers of specific information, each human being would not be so utterly unique. The elements play a major role, therefore, in perpetuating karma.

				 				Yoga has a system called bhuta shuddhi, which is about cleansing the elements of accumulated information or karmic substance. The five elements imbibe and hold information. This information naturally creates intention. Once you have an intention, you naturally start moving in a particular direction. By cleansing the elements of this layer of information, bhuta shuddhi is capable of transforming a human being in miraculous ways.

				Every yogic practice—whether it is a posture (asana) or other hatha yoga practices, or a breathing process (pranayama), or kriya (internal action)—is actually a way of cleansing the elements within us. But there is also a direct bhuta shuddhi process that is a hugely powerful way to clean up. This cannot be taught in a book, because it is a process of transmission, not instruction. But it is important to introduce readers to the existence of this possibility, because it is one of the most effective processes of inner cleansing.

				I believe I have initiated more women into the process than has ever happened in the past. Since the play of elements is different in the sexes—particularly fire and water, which are dominant in the female system—the traditional bhuta shuddhi process has been male oriented. However, by adapting it, we can make the same possibility available to both sexes. I believe this is necessary for our times, in order to ensure that no one is excluded from the amazing transformative potential of this process.

				 				What makes this process significant is that, over time, the elements in your system will be in consonance with your intentions for life. They begin to function the way you want them to. Over time, this will also have some impact on the elements around you.

				Eastern medicinal systems—including Ayurveda and Siddha—have always been based on the perception that no two human beings are alike. The way the elements function in one person is not the way they function in another. This makes them unique designer systems of medicine that are hard to standardize. The doctor prescribes differently for each person, because the treatment is based not on the ailment, but on the individual’s constitution. Five different people with the same symptoms will be treated differently. A deep understanding of the elements underlies this.

				Several human beings (not necessarily spiritual in any way) have found a way to perform bhuta shuddhi unconsciously. You may find people who are leaders in business or politics or art in the world who have this ability: when they enter a room, they change the atmosphere around them by their sheer presence. This is because of a certain amount of unconscious bhuta shuddhi. What is done unconsciously, however, has great power when done consciously. When bhuta shuddhi is done consciously, the elements rearrange the way they function within you in dramatic ways.

				Bhuta shuddhi is actually the most fundamental level at which we can cleanse karma. People can decide to cleanse the mind one morning by trying to alter their attitudes, but by the afternoon they lapse back into old grooves of thinking. This is why yoga does not work solely with psychology. It is a known fact that the human mind is notoriously unstable and given to oscillation. Yoga places greater faith in the physical.

				 				However, bhuta shuddhi is a way of addressing the very root of your karma—the patterns and predispositions that determine the person you think you are. If you prune the tree, it will sprout back with a vengeance. But if you dig out the root, it will be gone. So bhuta shuddhi is about radical transformation, not superficial change. It is about voluntarily relinquishing your compulsive hold on everything you have created—good, bad, ugly—so that the very source of creation can shine within you.





SADHANA


					Human performance in any sphere is always gauged in comparison with someone else’s. If your capacity to perceive is better than another’s, you have a major advantage over them. For if you enhance your perceptual capability, or your ability to see, the effectiveness of your action will be greatly enhanced. I often tell seekers that the aim is not to see something, but to simply learn to see.

					In order to enhance this perceptual ability, you could try a simple practice called the Akashi Mudra. You could do this practice particularly on those occasions when you feel you need to be at your best or to perform at your optimal capacity.

					There is a point of convergence in your energetic body that stretches beyond the physical body. It is approximately seventeen to nineteen inches from the point between your eyebrows. You must search for the point where the vision meets at an acute angle of eleven degrees. Finding that point of convergence boosts the akasha, or etheric element, within you. The moment the element of akasha is dominant, you will find the clarity of your perception hugely enhanced.





Minimizing Physical Memory


				In Part One, we looked at the insidious nature of physical memory, or runanubandha. Runanubandha is inevitable and vital for human survival, but, beyond a point, it can become a source of bondage. In a single lifetime, the volume of physical memory increases enormously. The reason is that people do not know how to manage and minimize the runanubandha in the system.

				This is why traditions fixed a certain stability in norms and practices—whether in terms of having a single partner, or something as simple as not accepting food or water in a stranger’s home, irrespective of their caste or class background. In traditional homes in India, people did not accept salt or lemon or sesame seeds from another’s hands. These substances are particularly effective carriers of memory. The premise was that the body remembers any kind of intimacy—not only with another physical body but with any physical substance. Some substances were considered to be more effective conductors of memory than others. For the same reason, in the yogic system, those who are into certain practices were asked to apply sandalwood paste or turmeric on the body. Others smeared earth on their body; a few others, ash from the cremation grounds.

				This is not mere ceremony and superstition. Today, forensic science has developed to the point that it is possible to tell through thermal imagery exactly who sat in a place seventy-two hours ago. The temperature of the body actually leaves a thermal imprint. Dogs have always been capable of tracking people down by picking up olfactory cues. Canine science is an old and advanced one!

				 				Every touch actually imparts a karmic imprint. Most people are not aware of this, but this imprint remains on a subtle level. One of the most sensitive areas of the body is the hands. By touching hands, runanubandha is effectively transmitted from one person to another.

				Holding hands is considered to be an intimate gesture for this reason. This simple act can bring two people even closer than sexual activity can. When sexuality is paramount, the need to explore the other’s body will be paramount. When you feel really close to someone, it often feels adequate to simply sit and hold hands.

				This is why the Indian tradition evolved the gesture of the namaskar: of folded hands in greeting when you meet someone, rather than kissing or embracing or shaking hands with them. The aim was not to clutter your system with too many physical connections.

				The namaskar is a beautiful greeting because it is a deeply respectful acknowledgment of the source of creation within another person. If you look at a person’s body or personality, you could either like or dislike it. This means a karmic pattern of craving or aversion is being set in motion. But when you bow down to the source of creation within someone—which is the same source that throbs within you—it means you acknowledge your shared and inherent divinity. You also ensure that you do not get entangled with yet another body through superfluous physical contact.

				The practice of touching a guru’s feet arose from the same understanding. Like the hands, the soles of the feet are particularly sensitive. By touching the feet, the guru’s energy could be transmitted to the disciple. An entire science exists around how the guru’s feet should be touched to ensure the maximum benefit. (Fortunately for me, most people do not really know the science! Although many Indians dive at my feet, they usually don’t go beyond a token gesture.)

				 				There are several other cleansing systems that make use of the purifying powers of the elements. In my own life, when I was into intense yogic practice, I would have somewhere between five to seven showers a day. When your system becomes so sensitive, you become conscious of the impact of every physical contact with your body—from a hand that you touch to the very cushion you lean against. Traditionally, yogis took a dip in the river at least twice a day at the very minimum. Flowing water can help erase runanubandha to a great extent.

				Interestingly, Nature offers some natural ways to cleanse oneself of karmic cycles. At certain times of the year in parts of the northern hemisphere, for instance (July and December–January), the elements of air and water are particularly strong and fluid. This allows one to cleanse oneself effortlessly. Karmic cycles that have become entrenched can be dropped by simply allowing the external elements to work upon you. Here is effortless bhuta shuddhi that happens for free!

				During certain times, simply standing in the wind can work wonders as a cleansing process. If you try standing in a strong wind for half an hour, you will soon learn what a proper “air wash” can achieve! It can leave you feeling so much lighter and rejuvenated.

				These are times when grace is naturally on your side. Seizing this opportunity can be particularly beneficial for people who are stuck in small karmic cycles. This is the right time to break free of small habits or niggling irritants in your life and see each day as a wonderful opportunity to step into unfamiliar terrain.

				 				Traditionally, fire was also used as a means of cleansing. The “fire wash” is used even today in many homes as a way of washing away negativity. These sensitivities developed because the entire tradition was oriented toward decluttering the system of the impressions gathered through random exposure to people, situations, and atmospheres.

				Even today, in the Isha Yoga Center, the monks wash their clothes separately. Mixing up the clothes in a washing machine may be easier, but it is not done because each one is at a different level of spiritual attainment.

				This is also the reason why the monks in the East traditionally wore earth colors. They use a very finely sieved red earth to wash their clothes, because this ensures that the only real runanubandha you hold is with the earth, not with the people around you. It is a tangible testimony to your connection with the planet: a reminder of where the body comes from and where it will eventually go.

				The old songs and poems of the East, from the ancient love lyrics to pop songs in cinema, extolled lifetimes—janam janam (life after life)—of togetherness, not merely for romantic reasons. Continuity and stability were valorized because they ensured a firm and reliable basis to your life from which you could aspire to the ultimate. Marriage was not just about two people’s little romance and their little families. It was about two people coming together for their ultimate liberation. This is why so many traditions view marriage as a sacrament. In traditional Hindu ritual, the mantras chanted while the couple circles the sacred fire is about consecrating the relationship and energy of two people so that they can both grow together to their ultimate possibility.

				 				Today, at Isha, we are conducting what is known as the bhuta shuddhi vivaha. This is a marriage based on bringing about an elemental cohesiveness between two people. In a world where couples see relationships as more and more hard work—where love has become labor—this kind of marriage creates harmony on the most fundamental level possible, making it a more lubricated and graceful partnership.

				When a certain stability in physical, genetic, emotional, and social relationships is attained, individual human life can grow to its peak. When there is instability, the physical memory grows confused and, over a period of time, can create serious psychological and physiological imbalances. If your ultimate aim is liberation, if your ultimate aspiration is to evolve into a divine possibility, this stability offers you an unwavering foundation from which you can extend yourself toward your final destination.





SADHANA


					The physical world is a product of polarities: masculine and feminine, yin and yang, ida and pingala, Shiva and Shakti, right brain and left brain. The longing to find the union of polarities finds expression through ambition, conquest, love, sex, and yoga.

					Yoga, as we all know, means union. The simplest form of yoga is to put your hands together in namaskar. Namaskar brings harmony between the two polarities within you. Try putting your hands together, bringing both palms together in proper alignment, and looking at someone or something with loving attention. In three to five minutes, you will begin to harmonize.

					 					Namaskar yourself into peace. Namaskar yourself into love. Namaskar yourself into union. Let us put our hands together and unite the world. May you unfold your being with folded hands.





Spirituality and Fast-Forward Karma


				When you consciously seek freedom from karma through a spiritual practice, you are essentially on fast-forward. When you churn up your inner life, certain dimensions of your karma come to the fore. At such junctures, it is possible to experience intense pain or discomfort. Of course, this could mean that you have contracted some ailment. But, frequently, this is just your past karma surfacing and manifesting itself in one way or another.

				The whole point of the spiritual process is to take on more of a karmic load than your allotted one in order to finish off as much as possible. It means you do not want to keep repeating the same cycles again and again. So if you are in an active spiritual process, you may find everything moving at a bewildering pace. Physical troubles that used to beset you every six months are now coming up every six hours! This is only because you have chosen to work out your karma as soon as possible. You are choosing not to live a sanitized life that regards spirituality as mere placidity.

				If your karma were to unwind slowly, it would probably create small aches over a long period of time. But the fast-forward of karma often means you might experience intense pain fleetingly. Many people have become less alive and less joyful and their lives slower and more apathetic because they experience low-level pain for stretches of time. A spiritual journey simply cranks up the process so what might have spread over three months or a year happens in a few minutes.

				 				It is important to allow this fast-forward karmic process to happen. Do not suppress it. It is wisest to let your physical body burn up your Allotted Karma as soon as possible. The basis of hatha yoga is just this: You learn to handle pain in the same way as you handle pleasure. If you learn this, you achieve an equanimity that will carry you beyond the turbulence of the karmic process.

				In yoga, the practice of kriya often hastens the karmic process without interfering with it. When you put chemicals into the system, however, you are creating another karma for which you pay a price in the future.

				Those who are meditative will experience deep levels of joy. But this also opens them up to deep levels of pain. This pain is only for a short duration, however, because their higher level of awareness allows them to work it out more quickly. When you go into deeper levels of meditation, if you take a single wrong step, the effect manifests itself immediately and you will have to correct it. But for the person who lives in relative unawareness, the process may be slow but much deeper. What takes a lifetime could be over on this very day for the spiritually aware person because they immediately take corrective measures.

				If you become meditative and still carry negativity, your negative karmas become a thousand times more powerful because you have become that much more sensitive and receptive. Suppose you cultivate the soil and enrich it with manure. The crops will grow well, but the same manure will also enable weeds to grow. Similarly, when you cultivate a meditative state and allow negative emotions to flourish, inner suffering increases dramatically. It is important to be extra cautious about weeding when you are in such a state. Otherwise you will be left with a forest of weeds and no crop!

				 				The reason those on the spiritual path have a daily practice is just this: to ensure that karmic stagnation does not happen. You may already have noticed that if you have a daily practice and you stop it for six months, many recurrent issues—physical, psychological, and social—that have not bothered you for a while start returning. This is how the karmic cycle works. You may have believed you were transformed, but you will suddenly find all kinds of compulsive behaviors returning with a vengeance. Only practice, or sadhana, helps break the cyclical movement of life.





EIGHT


			Karma Yoga and the Mental Body




SUTRA #8

				If you experience this moment just once, you will never be able to fall out of it.





Plunging into the Present


				In the modern world, ruled by the intellect, the mind is far more dominant than ever before. The body is no longer the most powerful presence in our lives. In an age of virtual reality, where lives can be lived out almost entirely in cyberspace, people are sometimes barely aware that they own a body!

				However, if we are able to use our mind to make a shift in our perspective, we can make a paradigm shift—one that can create the right ambience for the deeper journey toward liberation.

				This is not an invitation to a new philosophy. As a guru, I am not interested in offering spiritual advice. There is nothing new to add to the barrage of spiritual teachings to which we are heir. What I offer is a way, a living process. This is best transmitted during a live program in a controlled atmosphere. But even in a book, a significant shift can occur if the reader is willing and in the right state of openness. What follows is an invitation to a living wisdom. An invitation to shed vast volumes of karmic baggage so we can become receptive to grace.

				 				Now, human beings, as we all know, experience time as three different dimensions: past, present, and future. Our lives and our languages are structured around this.

				But let us look at this afresh.

				In actual fact, all that you call your past exists only as memory. Do you see this? All the life events that have shaped you; all the work you have ever done; all the money in your bank balance; all the vacations you have been on; all the conversations and arguments you have had; all the relationships of love and hatred and indifference; all the friendships and enmities you have nurtured; all the books you have read and movies you have seen; all the scriptures you have read—all this exists only in your memory.

				Similarly, all that you call future exists only as imagination. All that you long for and dread—your dream house; your perfect mate; your baby; your promotion; your pay hike; your beach home; the accolades you believe you deserve; all the horrific illnesses you could contract; all the terrible accidents that could befall all those you love; all the gruesome ways in which you could lose your money, your property, your family, your life; all the apocalyptic ways in which this planet could meet its end—all this exists only in your imagination.

				And so these are the only two things that you are suffering right now: your memory and your imagination. Nothing more. Both memory and imagination exist only in your mind. They are aspects of your psychological reality; they have nothing to do with the existential reality.

				 				Stop for a moment and ask yourself, When I am not lost in these mental constructs of memory or imagination, where am I?

				There can be only one answer to that: the present.

				The present is not a creed, a matter of faith. It is a reality. You don’t have to try to be in the moment. The present isn’t an idea. And the fact is, you don’t have to try to be in it. You are in the moment. There is nowhere else to be. Existentially, this is the only truth. It is just that you are not available to it.

				Does this mean that you should abandon your memory and imagination?

				Certainly not. In any case, we do not wish to destroy karma, because it is the glue that makes our physical and psychological reality possible. However, we do wish to transcend it when we choose. This means seeing one simple fact: your individuality is entirely made up. It is your creation.

				Your karma enables you to gather a certain amount of life. What you call “myself” is simply the name you give to the volume of life that you have captured. But if we wipe out all psychological imprints, you as a person will not exist. You will exist as pure life. Existentially, you are life in its essence. In that essential, unmanifest state, you are completely devoid of time and you are completely devoid of karma. You are deathless, indestructible, eternal.

				So what is left when the myth of individuality is shattered?

				You simply reach the end of cyclical time.

				This moment contains an infinite number of possibilities. You can destroy your entire psychological structure and create a new one at this very moment. Or you can stop creating entirely and exist as pure, formless life. This means you have chosen freedom over form, timelessness over temporality, the present moment over cyclical time.

				 				Think about it. Your understanding of time is essentially cyclical. The planet spins once; you call it a day. The moon revolves around the planet; you say it is a month. The planet goes around the sun; you proclaim that it is a year. Everything that is physical is cyclical. In the East, the world of cycles is called samsara. When we talk of transcending karma, we are essentially thinking of how to transcend the cycles of samsara.

				Once you break the cycle, there is no “you” and “me” anymore. For individuality exists only in time and space. Once we cross the boundaries of time and space, of memory and imagination, there is no “us” and “them.” There is no “here” and “there.” There is no “yesterday” and “tomorrow.” There is only this moment, and this moment is eternity.

				My cell phone has a mind of its own. It organizes my schedules; it anticipates my next word. It is not so different from my body, except that my body is a more sophisticated technology than my phone. I acquired my phone a year ago; I acquired my body over six decades ago. I am separate from both of them. The tragedy is that we have become so identified with our body (and our cell phone!) that we believe life without them is death.

				People all over the world look at the entire cosmos on their cell phones. But at the end of the day, all they’ve been looking at is their phone screens!

				Similarly, because you acquired a body and mind, you imagine you are going all over the place. But at the end of your life, you realize that you have just been looking at your projection: the phone screen of your mind. It is like being rudely jolted into reality after a movie, when the lights come on. You haven’t moved an inch; you have just been going round and round in exactly the same spot!

				 				The mind can create a cosmos of its own, but everything in it is a projection of your own making. You have begun to believe that each projection is a creation in its own right. It is not.

				You have a sense of time and space only because you are looking at everything through the prism of your Accumulated Karma. But if you go beyond your thought, your emotion, and your body and experience this moment just once, you will never be able to fall out of it.

				This physical reality that you know is way below one percent of the universe. Even the planet is not forever; it is an inconsequential ball of mud in the larger scheme of things. You are a super-minuscule speck on that. You forget that and pretend that you can create an entire universe based on the little data you have gathered.

				You then see yourself as an individual in opposition to the world. You see the larger universe as trying to crush your world. But it is only trying to crush something that doesn’t exist! Creation is simply reminding you that you are taking the virtual to be real. It is the magnanimity of creation that allows you an experience of individuality, even though you actually have nothing that you can call your own.

				Of course, you can have fun with the game of individuality and the dance of duality. I do not want to discredit your lived experience in any way. But I do want to remind you that it is a game—and one created by you. Go ahead and enjoy the ride, if it appeals to you. Just don’t take it too seriously, that’s all!





This Moment Is Inevitable


				How does all this lead to a paradigm shift?

				Here’s how.

				As we have seen, this moment is all there is. Accepting this is not a formula. It is not a theory. It means seeing reality just the way it is. It means aligning yourself with the way things are, not the way you think they should be.

				 				Once you accept that this moment is all there is, you see that this moment is inevitable. It cannot be any other way.

				Don’t try to make knowledge out of it. Don’t philosophize. Don’t say, “Yes, all moments are inevitable.”

				That is not what I am saying. All moments are not inevitable. Only this moment is inevitable.

				Do you see the difference?

				The inevitability of this moment is the only stable speck of time—the fulcrum upon which the entire physical creation rests.

				If you are conscious, there is only one place in which you can be.

				Now.

				Stay with moment-to-moment awareness. Now answer this simple question: Is the next moment inevitable?

				No.

				If you are consciously in this moment, you will see that only this moment is inevitable.

				The next moment?

				It is a million possibilities.

				If you are aware, you become a positive, dynamic acceptance of this moment. Happiness that one strives for is a natural ambience that you will live in. There is no other way to be, because happiness is not an occasion, a goal, a destination. Happiness is just your constant state of existence. And this is the end of suffering.

				This moment is therefore the only doorway both to creation and to the very source of creation. The rest is just hallucination. Your ideas of past and future are entirely delusional. If you consciously accept this moment just the way it is, you arrive at a certain ease within yourself. Ease is a consequence of the relaxation of all you have created. You can, in turn, experience the whole of existence as yourself. Everything becomes a part of you, as creation in its very nature exists as one whole. Knowing this experience is yoga, or the ultimate union.

				 				Most people don’t know how to be at ease. Restlessness rules their lives; they are always trying to get somewhere else. But the fact is: you cannot go anywhere else.

				In your mind, you can go to a million places. You can live in a perennial sense of elsewhereness if you choose. But the moment you are aware, you are in the present. Wherever you go, whatever you do, you can be only in this moment. Do what you want, you can be only in this moment. You can think about yesterday; you can think about tomorrow; you can think a million years ahead. But you are still doing it only in this moment.

				Does this mean you must never make plans, never reminisce about the past?

				Not at all. There is nothing wrong with using the faculties of memory and imagination. They are essential for our survival. We learn from our history and we certainly need to plan for our future. But there is a difference between using the mind and being used by it. It is time to stop being ruled by a hallucination, to stop being tyrannized by a dream.

				Now, once you accept something, you own it. Whatever you accept becomes a part of you. Whatever you do not accept stands apart like a huge hurdle.

				When I was in university, there was a classmate of mine who joined India’s National Cadet Corps. He was told that the paramilitary training would offer him good exercise and good food. After a few months, he was taken to a mock army camp, where he was given sentry duty. This required him to carry a heavy Lee-Enfield 303 rifle while walking up and down near the gate for six hours a day. He was a skinny boy, and he simply could not carry the rifle. He felt like his arm was coming loose.

				 				He complained to his commandant. “Sir, I cannot carry this rifle. It is too heavy for me. Give me some other responsibility. I cannot do this sentry duty.”

				The commandant simply stared at him.

				The boy scaled down. “Or let me use a stick instead of this rifle,” the boy pleaded. “The rifle is too heavy—and it doesn’t even have a trigger! In any case, no enemy is really going to attack. Let me use a stick instead.”

				The commandant said nothing.

				“Sir, please,” the boy implored him.

				The commandant reached out and caught hold of him by his shirt. “You see this? This is a uniform. Once you are in this uniform, you are a soldier. Why are you carrying a rifle? It is a part of you.”

				This statement had a profound impact on the boy. After six hours, even the strongest boys in the camp wanted to throw down their rifles. But this boy suddenly had no problem. He simply couldn’t put it down. It had become a part of him!

				Whenever pain enters your life, you tend to wonder, Why me? Even my mother-in-law didn’t get it! Of all the people in the world, why me?

				But once you accept something, it becomes a part of you. Even for a moment, if you accept something as a part of you, you attain a profound sense of harmony. You are attuned to life. If your acceptance is total, you can experience the whole of existence as part of yourself.

				Can existence really become a part of you?

				Now, that seems logically impossible. It is logically impossible, but that is the truth.

				As you are a part of existence, existence is also a part of you. As a drop is part of the ocean, the ocean is also part of the drop. This is because time and space are not absolutes; they can be stretched and contracted as well. Yoga has always said you can pack the whole of creation into a mustard seed! Modern physics confirms that time and space are not what we once thought they were. So once you transcend the limitations of your logic, you also transcend the limitations of time and space. If you become absolute acceptance, then everything—past, present, future—is here and now.

				 				Is this some kind of magic?

				No, this is reality, the most spectacular magic of creation.

				Accepting this moment is not a formula or a concept. It is the very basis of creation. It is in the lap of this moment that creation is happening. All you need to do is to accept this moment in its entirety. An uninhibited response to it, with all that you are—in thought, emotion, and the very life that you are—delivers you to a blessed reality—the very source of creation.

				Once you have come to this planet as a human being, if you do not experience your universality—the incredible possibility implicit in this moment—your human form has gone to waste. To merely eat, sleep, reproduce, and die, you do not need the sophisticated body, mind, and awareness you have been gifted with. If this tremendous gift is not explored, it is a terrible shame.





The Complexity of Conditioning


				What prevents human beings from discovering the profoundly transformative potential of the present moment?

				The answer is simple: a vagrant mind.

				The human mind is an infinitely complex mechanism. If you seek to liberate yourself from karma, it is important to have some understanding of how this elaborate mechanism functions. This highly intricate machinery is necessary for our physical survival. It can, however, often become a barrier to our longing for freedom.

				 				As we have seen, you may endlessly discuss freedom, but there is no such thing as freedom when the very way you think, feel, and perceive life is conditioned by your past experience. From the day you were born, your parents, your family, your culture, your religion, your education, your social context have worked upon you, determining who you are right now. So your mind is very deeply conditioned by your past.

				This conditioning is what we call karma. Your entire volume of past action, performed knowingly or unknowingly, has shaped who you are today. This has such a viselike grip on you that there is no question of free will. The very way you see the world is determined by your karmic lens. Let us look at the mental mechanism that creates your karma.

				Gautama the Buddha, a great scientist of the human mind, speaks of four aspects of the mind: vinyana (cognition), sanya (recognition), vedana (sensation), and sankara (reaction).

				Now, let us suppose a sound comes to your ears. It enters the first aspect of your mind. Vinyana cognizes that this is a sound, not a smell, taste, or sight. Sanya recognizes the sound: that this is a person speaking, a bird chirping, an automobile engine starting up, and so on. How does it recognize it? Every sound you have ever heard has been recorded, so a vast library of sounds exists within you. Without a past impression, there is no possibility of recognition. If, for instance, you hear the sound of a woodpecker for the very first time, your mind will be confused. But ten days later, if you hear it again, sanya will recognize it immediately.

				If there are some young people next door playing heavy-metal music, you may go into ecstasy, but your grandfather may have a nervous breakdown! The same sound creates a pleasant sensation in one person and drives the other crazy. Now, if you recognize the sound, vedana swings into action and produces a sensation. If you recognize this as music, pleasant sensations will happen; if you recognize this as noise, unpleasant sensations will happen. It is not the sound itself, but the way it is imprinted on you that makes you recognize it as pleasant or unpleasant. So the very way in which you experience life—whether you see it as sweet or sour, beautiful or ugly, pleasant or unpleasant—is your responsibility, as your ability to respond is what determines the nature of your experience.

				 				You are a sensory being. Your entire experience of life is a certain sensation. If you don’t feel a certain sensation, you are not even aware that that part of your body exists. When your leg goes numb for a few moments, you are not even sure if it exists. It is vedana that reminds you that you exist by giving you the experience of sensation. The way you recognize the sensory input is the way you experience life. Vinyana, sanya, and vedana—cognition, recognition, and sensation—are automatic and take place in a split second.

				However, the fourth part of the mind is related to reaction and is entirely in your conscious control. If a pleasant sensation arises and you say you love it, your sankara immediately says “Oh, he loves it. Store it in the love bag.” Now it is stored in your love bag forever. If an unpleasant sensation arises, and you strongly feel “I hate it,” sankara immediately says “He hates it. Store it in the hate bag.” It is then stored in the hate bag forever. If you find yourself oscillating between craving and aversion, love and hate, your karma is growing at a rapid pace; your bondage is intensifying. If you have strong likes and dislikes, your suffering is also more intense.

				But another scenario is also possible. If a sensation arises, you have a choice whether to react. Once you are able to exercise this choice, you simply experience the sensation for what it is. If you generate a strong reaction, you will distort the experience. But if you remain equanimous, the karma attached to that type of sensation begins to crumble within you.

				 				With equanimity, your entire structure of karma begins to collapse. All it takes is a willingness to experience everything the way it is. You are not avoiding experience or pursuing it. You are simply open to enjoying the different flavors of life without seeking one and escaping the other.

				Isn’t that the whole point of your sojourn on this planet: to experience as much of life as possible before you fall dead?

				So begin with this profound realization: this moment is inevitable.

				Put differently, one might say, allow this simple truth to percolate into you: my ability to respond is boundless.

				If you are aware of this truth, you will see that so much that seems to be restricting you right now will vanish in just twenty-four hours! Being in awareness for just three minutes will enable you to see an immediate difference. Once you are able to steadily maintain this awareness, you will find a time comes when there is no difference between you and a Buddha.

				As your acceptance deepens, you also move into higher and higher levels of freedom. Acceptance is freedom from the blame game, freedom from the drama of “othering,” freedom from the dance of duality. There is only you in this moment and no one else. Who then can you possibly blame?

				But when you keep resisting, you are creating deeper levels of bondage. Seeing that your ability to respond is limitless is profoundly important, because this ability goes way beyond your present level of understanding and perception.

				Now, the moment people hear that they have the ability to respond even to events that happened before they were born, they are given to dismissing this as nonsense: “I am responsible for things that happened before my birth? This is outrageous! This is crossing the limits of logic!”

				 				But let us look at it another way.

				Suppose my grandfather had given twenty-five million dollars to your grandfather as a loan. Today, I read my grandfather’s old diary and see that he has clearly made note of this transaction on a particular day. My grandfather passed away three days after this loan was made, and so the money was never repaid.

				I have proof of the transaction. So I come to you and say “My grandfather lent your grandfather this sum of money before we or our fathers were born. I have proof. Since we are friends, I will waive the interest. But please return the principal amount.”

				What would you say to that?

				Obviously, you would say “Sheer nonsense! Why am I responsible for something that happened before I was born? Go ask my grandfather for it!”

				But let us say the tables are reversed. I am enjoying my property, but you found some old papers this morning that clearly say that this property belongs to your grandfather. What would you do? How would you act? You would immediately have contacted your lawyers, wouldn’t you?

				If your grandfather made wealth or owned property before you were born, you would definitely take responsibility for it. But if he had taken a loan, of course you are not responsible!

				This is an ancient social game: heads, I win; tails, you lose.

				The fact is, your responsibility—whether you like it or not, know it or not—goes way beyond your present levels of understanding. If you accept this fact, your life naturally comes to a certain ease and harmony. The more you start seeing that you are responsible for your life, the closer you move toward your liberation. If you try to pass the buck to somebody, you will start moving toward your entanglement.

				 				Let us say you were walking on a street and some passerby stepped on your foot and broke it. You are in great pain, and you hold the passerby responsible. When you hold someone responsible for your pain, you tend to wish the same to them. On the other hand, if you were able to think “What happened is unfortunate, but if my leg is broken, it is my karma,” you would take responsible action, rather than fritter away time and energy complaining, cursing your fate, or planning your vendetta.

				Which is a more intelligent way to exist?

				Don’t make the mistake of thinking karma is fatalism. Acknowledging karma means that you see that your life is one hundred percent your doing. If you see this, you will create your life the way you want it, rather than sitting around feeling helpless, cursing your parents’ genes or your current circumstances. Seeing your life as self-created, rather than as an accidental phenomenon—this is the basis of karma. This is an empowered life that will naturally move toward liberation.





SADHANA


					Most human beings do not realize the tremendous power of creativity they have been endowed with. This is because most of their creations are determined by their compulsiveness, not by their freedom. Anything created by limitation will be limited. But if you see your ability to respond as limitless, the power to create is super-enhanced.

					Here is something you can try for yourself. If you drop your self-image completely, you will find yourself in a state of great freedom. You now have the power to live without a self-image at all. You also have the power to transform your image altogether. Basically, you can pick up an image and drop it at will. Either way, nothing will stick to you.

					 					I will not tell you how you should be. But stop now and create yourself anew in your mind. Start with the skeletal structure. Slowly, move into the flesh and blood.

					Close your eyes and visualize how you would like other people to experience you. How would you like the fundamental nature of your thought and emotion to be? What kind of impact would you like to have on the world?

					Create a whole new being.

					Then see if this new image is any closer to your notion of the divine than the old. Is it really better than the earlier image? Examine it in great detail. Is this new image more capable, more human, more loving, more blissful?

					Visualize this new image as powerfully as you can. Make it come alive within you. If your thought is powerful enough, if your visualization is powerful enough, it can even break through the bonds of karma.

					Here is an opportunity to transcend all your limitations of thought, emotion, and action. Here is an opportunity to consciously craft yourself to become the creation you want to be.





Creating Distance from the Karmic Structure


				The primary aim of meditation is to create a certain distance between you and your physical, mental, and energy bodies. Your mental body is a major manufacturing unit of karma. If you see that your mind is the principal source of karma, you are on the right path. Once there is a distance between you and the mind, there is a distance from the past. Now all those memories are available when you need them, but they no longer have the power to rule you.

				 				The aim is one day to create a situation within you in which you have the living experience I am not the accumulations of my mind. Now your karma has no power over you. This is the first step toward freedom.

				There is a growing trend of attempting past-life regressions in the hope of looking into one’s karmic structure. This is absolutely unnecessary if one is on a spiritual path. Sifting through the content of your mind is an endless and pointless exercise. The spiritual seeker does not want to drop karma selectively. The aim is to drop the package entirely.

				Once there is a clear space between you and your mind, your karma empties very rapidly. You have now stopped creating new stock, which helps enormously. The old stock will flow out very quickly with the passage of time.

				You are now able to see My mind belongs to me, but I am not my mind. It is like driving a car. The engine responds to everything you intend it to do, but it is not you. When you get deeply involved with your car, you may see it as an extension of yourself. Many people do! But when you are able to distance yourself from your mind, your capacity to make it do what you want it to do increases. Once you can separate yourself this way, you do not have to worry about karma ever again.

				The basis of karma is simple: you are the source of all your baggage. When you clearly perceive this, your essential quality changes. If you see someone else as the source, you will always be distracted, disoriented, bitter, frustrated, agitated, and angry. When you see yourself as the source, you are centered. Your energies are now focused within you. You are no longer enacting rituals of blame and rage in your head. You are no longer enslaved to your external environment or to your mind.

				 				Once you understand karma as your responsibility, you are free. Once you distance yourself from your mind, you are also free. Both approaches work.





Reclaiming Responsibility


				It happened.

				On a certain day, Shankaran Pillai went to the bar. He settled down at the bar counter. “See, I need a drink, but I don’t have any money on me right now,” he told the bartender.

				“Please leave,” said the bartender immediately. “We don’t entertain such people here.”

				Shankaran Pillai was unfazed. “Wait a moment. I can show you something. If you’re impressed by it, you give me a free drink. If you aren’t, I promise to go away without a word.”

				Then Shankaran Pillai proceeded to pull out a toad from his pocket. He placed it on the counter.

				The bartender asked, bored, “Are you going to tell me that if I kiss it, it will turn into a princess?”

				“No, no,” Shankaran Pillai assured him. “Just wait.” And he pulled out a hamster from another pocket. “This hamster,” he announced, “can recite chapters from the Bible for you.”

				“Hah!” the bartender scoffed. “Don’t bullshit me, man.”

				“Just listen,” Shankaran Pillai said.

				And the hamster promptly recited Galatians 5.

				“Hey, this is incredible!” the bartender exclaimed and fixed Shankaran Pillai a drink.

				Shankaran Pillai accepted the drink and put the hamster back in his pocket. “You know, I’m never done with one drink,” he said. “I can make this toad recite the Bible, too. Ask for any chapter.”

				 				“How about Genesis 3?” asked the impressed bartender. The toad promptly reeled it off.

				The bartender was amazed. He offered Shankaran Pillai yet another drink.

				Shankaran Pillai downed it and announced, “And now this toad is for sale.”

				Everyone in the bar immediately started bidding. The bidding was fast and furious. The toad was finally sold for two hundred dollars.

				As Shankaran Pillai was about to give the toad to the highest bidder, the bartender held him by the collar and pulled him across the counter. “You idiot!” he hissed. “You’re giving away a talking toad for two hundred dollars! I can get you two million if you’re willing to split.”

				Shankaran Pillai said calmly, “No, no, it doesn’t matter. What they’re paying is enough.”

				He collected his two hundred dollars and handed over the toad. The excited man who bought it ran out of the bar to show off his new acquisition.

				The bartender told Shankaran Pillai, “You’re a nutcase. A talking toad for just two hundred dollars!”

				Shankaran Pillai said, “Don’t worry. It’s just that my hamster is a ventriloquist.”

				This absurd state of affairs is actually the way many people lead their lives. They choose to outsource the responsibility all the time—to their equivalent of the hamster.

				Most of the time, people pass the buck to their old karma. The tragedy is that in the process, they miss the enormous potential of this moment. They barter away the transformative power of the present by ensuring the future is a repetition of their past.

				 				Your old karma is not the problem. The problem is that your present karma is looking for an escape route. It wants to blame someone else. It wants to go to the past, or the future, and escape the present. And so the same old cycle of victimhood and passivity perpetuates itself. Stop and see: you might well find you are doing it right now.

				Yes, it is true that your old karma creates certain tendencies that influence you. However, every human being has awareness enough to overcome these tendencies. Not a single person needs to be enslaved by their hereditary blueprint. Each of us has a choice: the choice to transcend our karmic inheritance or to be tyrannized by it.

				How many times do you overhear people say something along the lines of the ventriloquist hamster? “I really want to control my temper, but you know how it is: my father’s genes…” Or “I wish I could start cleaning up my street, but I live in such an apathetic neighborhood.” With every statement of this kind, you are not merely making sweeping verdicts about your past; you are writing off your future before you live it.

				Irrespective of past karma, if you handle your present moment right, things can change fundamentally. This is the beauty of being human. It doesn’t matter what kind of baggage you are carrying; if you are willing to be absolutely conscious, the past has no impact upon you. I have seen this in countless numbers of people. With just a little better understanding of the mechanics of their mind, even without any serious sadhana, they find themselves more joyful than ever before. Without knowing why, they find themselves walking with a new spring in their step, singing in the shower, or whistling during the day. In the Inner Engineering program I conduct, even before we initiate people into an energy action called a kriya, just hearing about the workings of the mind frees them up in many ways.

				 				What you call karma—the bags of tendencies and predispositions you carry with you—is only in your memory and imagination. So if you inhabit this moment deeply, fully, completely, you have dropped your karmic load.

				It is time to let go of the past. Live consciously, and you will see that this moment cannot be fragmented into past and future, into now and then. All that ever was in this creation is only in this moment, and all that will ever be is only in this moment.

				The present is your only address. The here and now is your only abode.





NINE


			Karma Yoga and the Energy Body




SUTRA #9

				It is not about performing miracles. It is about recognizing the miracle of life that you are.





Fixing the Destination


				I often say that there is only one thing I am really good at: making places and people crackle with energy. Everything else that I do—all my travels around the world, giving talks, conducting programs, initiating environmental, educational, and cultural projects—is incidental. This does not mean I do not value the work that I do. I throw myself wholeheartedly into all of it. But my primary area of expertise is life energy. I am an energy mechanic above all else.

				Karma yoga on the level of the energy, or pranic, body is vital for many reasons. For one, it can transform or regenerate the energy body in such a way that it is not just born anew but actually stays new. No matter how much exercise or hatha yoga you do, how carefully you watch your diet, your physical body will age and decay. The mental body is a wonderful instrument, but it can also rust with age. There are many who find that their memory is not as sharp as when they were younger. The energy body, however, can be completely unaffected by the aging process. You can maintain it just the way it was when you were born and keep it in mint-fresh condition until you die. The impact of a strong energy body on your life and on the world around you is tremendous. For many, it can seem near-miraculous.

				 				At the Isha programs, participants are initiated into what is known as a kriya—a powerful yogic process that renews and re-invigorates the energy body. I call it the path of inner action, because it does not involve the physical or mental body. It is action purely on the level of energy. If practiced regularly, it ensures that the energy body stays vibrant and alive. If you are able to maintain your energy body like that of a newborn infant every moment of your life, you will find that external and internal circumstances invariably unfold in the best possible way for you.

				There is yet another reason why working with the energy body is beneficial. It is the most direct way of addressing the tricky dimension of one’s karmic inheritance. I call it tricky because the karmic residue is not a body by itself, but a dimension that occupies the physical, mental, and energy bodies. Addressing karma on the physical level is important, as we have seen: it can cleanse the elements; help minimize physical memory; and through the practice of hatha yoga, it can revitalize and upgrade the system. Addressing karma on the mental level is also important: it can create a paradigm shift in the way you live your life and inhabit this moment. However, when you address your karma on the level of energy, the process is deeper and swifter, and it rapidly accelerates change on all the other levels.

				 				Above all, it is capable of changing your destination. Yoga on the level of the physical body can bring well-being; on the level of the mental body, it can bring joy, equanimity, and peace; but on the level of the energetic, it ensures that you are heading only toward your liberation.

				If you do physical work, the physical body is exercised and will grow well. If you do mental work, your mental body is exercised and will grow considerably. Most people, unfortunately, never exercise their energy body, so it remains weak. This is why so many people in the world who have money, wealth, fame, even a social media following, still feel insignificant. A yogi has no such feeling because their energy body is highly developed.

				The same life event could leave a different imprint on different people. A marriage breaking up could be a boon for one person. But another may be mentally broken, another physically sick. Whatever you eat, drink, and breathe is energy. Whether you transform it into physical, mental, or life energy is up to you. Energy is neither created nor destroyed; it is only transformed.

				It happened.

				Shankaran Pillai was looking for a new residence. While apartment hunting, he met a landowner. The landowner asked him, “Where have you been staying all these years?”

				Shankaran Pillai mentioned that he had been in one part of town a month ago, another part of town two months ago, and in a completely different district six months ago.

				The landowner grew suspicious. “Why do you keep shifting residence? Do you have many enemies?”

				“No, no, I don’t have a single enemy,” Shankaran Pillai declared breezily. “But for some reason, all my friends hate me.”

				 				Describing enemies as friends is, of course, mere euphemistic wordplay! It bears no relationship to reality. Many choose to live their lives at this superficial level. They opt for self-improvement rather than self-transformation, hoping that a life of tepid affability and general agreeability will take them to the ultimate. They forget that the social has nothing to do with the existential.

				This is why karma yoga has to be approached on many levels. Merely working on the levels of the physical and the psychological is not enough. If you clean your mental slate of karmic substance, you may be appreciated socially because there is a certain peace, joy, and sweetness about your presence. People may enjoy being around you because you’ve cleaned up your mind. But this still does not change the direction in which you are going. You will still be influenced by the residual impact of lifetimes of experience that lead you by your tendencies. Only if you begin to clean the energy body of karmic content will you begin to move in a new direction. Instead of being ruled by tendencies, you now begin to become a conscious being.

				The kriya Shambhavi Mahamudra that I initiate people into during my Inner Engineering programs is significant for this reason. It picks off the karmic material from the energy system and thereby changes your destination. It would be possible to devote the program to turning out pleasant human beings. This would meet with great social approval. But whether you are pleasant or unpleasant has no spiritual relevance. Once you transform the content of the energy body, the fundamentals of life will begin to alter. You are now hugely empowered to begin your march toward freedom.





The Yoga of Heat and Light


				I am often asked by people how they can burn their karma. I tell them that burning karma is relevant only up to a certain point. It gives you the necessary clarity to look at life in an unclouded way and offers you a certain freedom from compulsions, anxieties, and fears. But if you burn up your entire karmic stock, the physical and mental bodies will not be able to sustain themselves. For this reason, retaining the body is a perennial challenge for an enlightened being.

				For most spiritual practitioners, after some amount of karmic burning, it is best to perform a kind of sadhana that gives you a certain distance from the karma. The presence of karma will keep your practice going; at the same time, the practice gives you a certain gap between you and your body and mind. This is the kind of person that is urgently needed on this planet today. Most of what needs to be done in this world does not get accomplished because people have no capacity to distance themselves from their karmic compulsions.

				Once you have a certain distance from the karma, it doesn’t matter what kind of karma you have. Your karma adds color to the world, in fact. The world is full of all kinds of crazy, unique human beings, and that is wonderful as long as they are not compulsive! If there are no compulsions, there is no good or bad, correct or incorrect way to be. Everything is part of the great, colorful tapestry of life.

				Do not forget: Compulsions can be of many kinds. Whether you smoke or drink or pray all day, your actions can still be compulsive. Whatever you do, if it is done with joy and gratitude and if it moves you toward freedom from cycles, it makes all the difference. If a certain prayerful attitude grows within you out of your joy and gratitude, that is beautiful. It is the context, not the content of your life, that determines karmic accumulation.

				 				This is why the eight limbs of yoga (ashtanga yoga, as it is known) are structured in a particular way: the first three limbs (yama, niyama, and asana) are considered to be the fire aspect and are purificatory; the last four (pratyahara, dharana, dhyana, and samadhi) are considered to be the light aspect and are enlightening. The fourth limb—pranayama—is considered to be the intermediate transitory step, combining both fire and light.

				Yama and niyama are simple guidelines, the dos and don’ts on the spiritual path, such as nonviolence; commitment to truth; not stealing; not hoarding wealth; purity; cleanliness; practice; and so on. They create the right atmosphere for one’s spiritual evolution. Once a person is enlightened, these dos and don’ts are of little relevance. When compassion within you is overflowing and divinity has come to the fore, no rules need to be prescribed. Human nature at this point knows exactly what needs to be done in a given situation. But these simple moral strictures were identified for the benefit of those starting out on the path.

				Asanas are, of course, the many physical yoga postures practiced by the seeker in a certain state of awareness. They are a way of manipulating your inner energies in a particular direction, a way of kneading the body toward a higher possibility. If you have ever made bread, you will know that the quality of the bread depends on how efficiently the dough has been kneaded. The quality of an earthen pot depends on how well the clay has been kneaded. Similarly, asanas are about elevating consciousness by thoroughly kneading the body. This is how deep the science of yoga is: it journeys from the outer to the inner, reminding us that working consciously on the physical level can alter the way one thinks, feels, and experiences life and can ultimately lead one to higher spiritual possibilities.

				 				The fourth limb, pranayama, entails consciously working with prana, or life energy. It is the intermediate stage of both fire and light, because it is both purgative and enlightening in nature.

				Pratyahara—turning inward—is a particularly important limb of yoga and is most challenging in modern times, when the world is more distracted by external stimulation than ever before. It entails looking at even the physical and the psychological as external accumulations and spells a complete withdrawal from body and mind.

				Dharana is constant unbroken attention toward the inner, based on the premise that whatever you pay unwavering attention to is what you become connected with. In an age dominated by electronic media and a virtual epidemic of people diagnosed with ADHD, this limb, too, is more challenging than ever before.

				Dhyana is a state of immersion, or meditation, when there is no longer a divide between you and the inner world (to which you have paid attention during dharana). Two have now become one.

				In the final stage, samadhi, one has dissolved into nothing. There is absolute equanimity because the discriminatory mind has subsided. The beyond now makes its presence felt.

				Purification, or karmic burning, is necessary for those who are entangled and compulsive. Without that burning, most people will not be able to meditate. But once meditation begins, the path is no longer about burning; it is instead an illuminating process of creating a certain distance between yourself and your physical and mental dimensions. This is the journey to freedom.

				Most spiritual practitioners will vouch for this. Ninety percent cannot meditate; only after a practice that fires them and burns up compulsive karmas can they close their eyes and sit still. So the ideal sadhana is a balance between the fire and the light aspects. Personally, I am fine with the fire aspect, because I cannot stand insipidity. I prefer rage to tameness and lifelessness! But those who are on fire all the time do not fit into social situations easily. So it is best to create a balance between the two.

				 				Once your Allotted Karma (prarabdha) is handled, a certain inner space is freed up within you. This gives you the room to perceive life with a certain clarity. You need not work out everything else, because you now see that the entire karmic influence is illusory. Once you have that clarity of realization, it is easy to drop it when necessary.

				Working out your entire Accumulated Karma (sanchita) is a very long process, because the accumulation is massive. So do not try to investigate the content of your warehouse; it will take forever to go through, and it might well engulf you! The danger of sifting through your karma is that you could well find precious elements that you want to preserve. Just handle the Allotted Karma and make use of the clear space to drop the Accumulated Karma altogether. The moment you close the retail outlet, the warehouse looks like meaningless trash! So when the time comes, you simply dispose of the entire warehouse wholesale—with all its content and storage facility.

				It is the sun that has turned water into a cloud and given it a silver lining. But the cloud is now blocking the sun! You could write endless poetry about this exquisite silver-laced cloud, but you will end up missing the sun. This is the nature of karma. As beautiful as it may look, it blocks the source of creation. There may be beauty in some aspects of karma. But do not forget the source from which it has sprung. The source may be no-thing, but implicit in it is a great possibility: the possibility to become everything.





SADHANA


					While every kriya requires an initiation, there is one kriya that I offer that requires no initiation. This is the Isha Kriya, a simple daily practice that enhances health, dynamism, material and spiritual well-being; offers a means to cope with the hectic pace of modern life; and empowers one to live life to its fullest potential. It is a reminder that there is much more to us than our body and our mind. Those who are interested in exploring this three-stage practice will find it on the Sadhguru app (isha.sadhguru.org/​app).





Karma and the Alignment of Bodies


				I am often asked what my message is as a guru.

				It amuses me, because I have none. I tell people: You are not studying with me. I have nothing to teach. I want you to get lost! I want to invite you to that place of borderless ignorance—that the ancients have called enlightenment—and the only way to get there is to lose yourself. There is no other way.

				Teachings will not get you through the many insidious karmic blocks in your life. The karmic walls are like sheets of glass. If they were like walls of brick, you could see them and you could break them. But the problem with sheets of glass is that everything seems to be open, but when you try to reach out, you are locked in.

				A teaching, after a certain period of time, becomes a block by itself. You will twist it to your convenience. People have done this to teachings all over the world. Initially, a teaching has an impact on you because it is new and you have no clue as to how it works. But over a period of time, you will start twisting it to your convenience. You will make the teaching support you. This is counterproductive, because the teaching is not meant to support you; it is meant to demolish you!

				 				Once a teaching has become a source of convenience, it is no good. This is why a guru talks from so many different dimensions that seem contrary. The aim is not to allow you to settle anywhere. The moment you settle, you will start using the teaching to your advantage.

				This is also why a guru always offers an energy-based practice. Just doing a daily kriya—every morning, sitting and breathing in a certain way—can decimate these karmic blocks. If you don’t fully understand the teachings, it’s okay. If you keep doing the practice, after some time, you find a new sense of openness and freedom in you. That is always the bedrock you can rely on.

				Work on the level of the energy body is about an entire recycling of your energy. When this recycling is under way, it will bring back many impulses, compulsive behavioral patterns, mental habits, and emotional whirlpools. This is inevitable, and it is nothing to be afraid of. This is simply what we mean by karma. When you start cultivating your energy to access a different dimension, the karmic cleansing is inevitable.

				This is because the whole karmic structure is being dismantled on some level. With constant practice, the aspiration is to unburn the pot, to dissolve it into pure clay. You are melting the frozen complex of habits and predispositions into pure energy. Only when your energies become this fluid can you sit and meditate. This is because you have now become pure life: you are no longer a bundle of thoughts and impressions. You are in a state of receptivity to grace.

				Remember this: there is no utility to a spiritual process. You cannot use it, but you can be transformed by it. Transformation means that you lose your original form and are completely willing to take on new forms. You become an unburnt pot, as it were. You can no longer be filled with water, but, as pure clay, you are capable of taking on an endless number of forms.

				 				There is a well-known Indian folktale about the immortal love of Sohni and Mahiwal. Sohni crosses the river each night to meet her forbidden lover, Mahiwal. Since she belongs to a family of potters, she uses an earthen pot to stay afloat and make her way across the river. But one night, her sister-in-law, who wants to sabotage her secret romance, substitutes an unburnt pot for a burnt one. Inevitably, the pot melts, and Sohni is engulfed by the swirling waters—a tragic end to this love story.

				Try as we might, neither love nor the spiritual process can ever be made utilitarian. They are simply part of the beauty of life. The moment you try to harness love or spirituality, you find your arms are empty. The moment you try to concretize them, you end up with a marriage or a religion. You may acquire many other things—a home, a family, a god, a heaven—but you lose the very exuberance of life. When you try to institutionalize an inner experience, all you are left with is an institution!

				So once your energies begin to rise, you will find your life suddenly seems more eventful than before, internally and externally. The important thing is not to hesitate, but to keep the practice going full throttle. The yogic kriyas are structured in such a way that they will never cause you any harm.

				As we have seen earlier, there can sometimes be a mismatch between the physical body and the energy body. Suppose you took a little car and attached a powerful engine to it—it could be a disaster. The car would fall apart, not because the engine is bad, but because it is too good. Similarly, if your energy body is greatly enhanced without enhancing the physical body or working with the karmic substance, it is possible that one or the other will collapse.

				 				Any attempt to empower the energy body, therefore, must be accompanied by work on every other level. Before people are initiated into powerful kriyas, they need to do a rigorous amount of sadhana. Without physical practice, people cannot experience the kriyas in all their depth and intensity.

				When preparing for initiation into powerful kriyas, practitioners must also prepare the mind. They need to expand their set of identifications, to widen their understanding of who they are. When they are reminded that their ability to respond extends to the entire cosmos (not just to a family and community); that inclusive involvement is far less entangling than selective involvement; that they are parents not just to their children but to the entire world, the karmic structure loosens considerably. Now it can accommodate a considerable expansion of the energy body.

				If energies expand when the karmic substance sits tight upon you, you could feel like you are being ripped apart. This can be hugely disruptive to your life. If you are not able to endure it, an enhancement of the energy body is pointless. It is ideal, therefore, to expand the karmic structure in such a way that it is able to withstand the intensity that arises in the energy body during kriya yoga.





When My Energies Touched the Peak


				The ways in which energy transformation can manifest physically is something I know firsthand. At the age of twenty-five, when I had my first experience of life beyond my physical and mental faculties on a hill in the city of Mysore, I had no idea what had hit me.

				 				Things started changing rapidly after that. Much was internal, but there were external changes, too, that no one could miss. My voice changed, for one. The timbre and quality were distinctly different. The quality of my gaze, even the shape of my eyes, seemed to change, and my gait was dramatically altered. I tried to resume my old way of walking, but I could not. The very shape of my body had changed. And I am in absolutely no doubt that the shape of my brain changed as well!

				The realignment of the chakras—or energy centers—in the human system can produce dramatic results. Energy interventions can completely rewire the system and alter the impact of genetic, evolutionary, and elemental memory. It is these dimensions of memory that unconsciously restrict us in many ways. To become free from their impact or to learn to disconnect from them when necessary is a very important aspect of yogic practice.





SADHANA


					Depending on the volume or type of karma you have gathered, you have developed certain vasanas that make you move in certain directions and attract certain life situations and people toward you.

					If you find that you are constantly attracting the wrong people into your life or drawing unpleasant situations toward you, it is important to pause, take a backward step, and see how to re-draw this software that has been unconsciously written into yourself.

					It is like this: Suppose you are driving and your car goes out of control. What is the first thing you would do? You might want to gift it to your enemy, perhaps! But after that tempting thought, the first thing to do is to apply the brakes and stop it, isn’t it? It is the same with your life. When things are going out of control for no explainable reason, you need to turn off the engine for a while.

					 					Bring the whole machinery of thought, emotion, and action to a halt for a short while. Just the act of pausing and attending to your interiority for a short period will make the difference. You will see; things will correct themselves.

					You need to do nothing else. You do not need to call for divine intervention. You need not call for angelic help or astral guidance. You simply need to pause. You will find that your mind and body work miraculously after this, simply because you gave your system the necessary time to fix and re-draw itself the way it wants.





Sacred Spaces and the Karmic Fast-Forward


				Energy interventions are possible in many ways. One is through kriya yoga under the guidance of a master; another is by simply living in a space that is energetically vibrant and consecrated in a particular way.

				There are many empowered sacred sites in the world. These energy centers—called teertha in Sanskrit—are simply an invitation to seekers to sit and marinate. Like soaking a soiled cloth in detergent, merely soaking in the energy of these places can remove karmic stains that you are unaware of.

				The powerful spiritual legacy of countless mystics pervades the Velliangiri Mountains in southern India. The Isha Yoga Center in Coimbatore is situated at the foothills of these majestic mountains, a location offering tremendous possibilities for spiritual growth. The center itself has been consecrated in a powerful way so as to accelerate the karmic process.

				 				Making use of such a place does not take any belief. People don’t have to see me as their guru to make use of it. It is even absolutely fine if people have a problem with me! If they know how to make use of the space, everything they could possibly need for their spiritual growth is right here. I encourage people everywhere to come experience this possibility. The place is simply loaded with energy. It is the kind of place where transformations that people would consider miraculous are possible. All it takes is to simply close your eyes, sit in the space, and soak it in.

				As a guru, I am often asked why I don’t perform miracles. I point out that we are surrounded by miracles all the time. The soil that you walk upon transforms itself into flower and fruit, a flower transforms filth into fragrance, time transforms a rock into a diamond. The miracle that I am, the miracle that I want to manifest on this planet, is that it is possible to be involved and immersed and engaged in this world and yet remain untouched by it. There are many around me today who embody this miracle. This, for me, is the only miracle that counts.

				There are sites all over the world where immense spiritual power is centered around a specific form or sanctum. The Isha Center has the Dhyanalinga and the Linga Bhairavi, which are powerful energy centers.

				However, what is more unusual in the center is that the entire space is saturated with spiritual energy. This is, for one, because there are multiple consecrated shrines across the entire premises. This is also because of those wonderful mystics who have lived in these surrounding mountains; it is their aspiration and intention to make this grace available to all. It has been a privilege for me to create a center in a land sanctified by their presence.

				 				Different energetically intense spaces offer different possibilities. But at the Isha Yoga Center, we ensure that the only possibility is to fast-forward karma and hasten the spiritual process. Nothing else is relevant. There are many places all over the world that pulsate with raw energy, but this is one where the energy is calibrated to assist you on every step of the spiritual path.

				Once the energy of a place is set in a certain direction with a particular intensity, nothing will escape its influence. Every being in the vicinity will start moving toward it, unconsciously or consciously. This has nothing to do with a teaching. It is just life longing for itself.

				Certain geographies can certainly accelerate the karmic process. But do not expect it to be joyful all the time. In intense spin cycles, there can be moments that are challenging. But it is all worth it when you find yourself emerging from the cyclical nature of the karmic process and from the terrible rut of rehashing the same story over and over.

				The longing for liberation, or mukti, is not because life is miserable. When you are miserable, you long for heaven, not liberation. The longing for liberation arises only when life is good, but you naturally want to evolve to the next dimension. You do not want to go through the tedium of the same cycles time and again.





Karma and the Energy Body at Birth


				One can know many things about a child at birth. Most people notice that some infants are bright-eyed and observant; others seem quieter; some move their limbs more; others are less active. Traditionally, in India, within the first eleven days of their child’s birth, parents often took the infant to a yogi or seer for a blessing. This is because the karmic substance is still fluid at this stage. Before the baby’s personality begins to get consolidated, they want a blessing that can ensure that the child’s life journey will be a smooth and seamless one.

				 				The actual karmic journey begins even before that. Somewhere between forty and forty-eight days after conception, the karmic fiber begins to tighten. It is like a spring coil. Depending on past information, the strength of the physical body, the nature of the parent, the type of conception, and various other factors, the karmic fiber chooses a certain amount of information that winds itself into a coiled spring.

				If I look at the tension of the karmic fiber, I can often estimate when a person was born and approximately when they are going to die. Of course, accidents or unintended damage to the body can occur, so not every person is able to work out their Allotted Karma. However, barring accidents, most people’s karmic coil unwinds at a certain pace.

				Those who are capable of sitting still will find that their karma unwinds rapidly. Those who lead active lives pile up new karma, so the process is slower. Nonetheless, the karmic coil continues to unwind. So it is possible to assess how long the karmic journey will continue for a person if they live a standard life. If they come in touch with a guru, of course, these predictions are no longer possible. With a spiritual master’s intervention, the karma can be released rapidly, if necessary.





Aging and Death


				Toward the end of a person’s life, as the Allotted Karma reaches completion, the energy body begins to grow feeble. As a result, the physical body grows increasingly feeble as well, and the capacity of the energy, or pranic, body to hold on to the physical body recedes. As the information runs out, life slowly peters out. Physical life begins to lose its intensity.

				 				This is why you may notice that even a person who has lived a very base, material life often seems in the last few days before their death to carry an air of ethereal peace, maturity, and wisdom. Such a person is much less attached to people and less shaken by external situations.

				When the pranic (energy) body is feeble, it will slip out of the body. This is what we call death by old age. The doctors invariably diagnose this as an organ failure of some sort, but the fact is just that the person has slipped out of the body because of the feebleness of the energy body. This is the ideal way to die because you are not being forced out of the body; you are naturally moving out. This is a good way to go.

				However, how rapidly you empty your Allotted Karma depends on how swiftly you are willing to move from one aspect of life to another. If at eighty, you still think you should act as you did at eighteen, you are in trouble. You will die an unnatural death, because even if you live to be a hundred, your body will run down, but your karmic information will not.

				Now, if a person’s Allotted Karma is not worked out, but their body breaks for some reason—perhaps they crash their car or drink themselves to death or contract some fatal disease—their karma still remains. The same volume of Allotted Karma is still present, which means that the person’s individuality is still strong. Such a disembodied being is in popular parlance termed a ghost. Their Allotted Karma and energy body is still intense, but there is no physical body to support it. The intellect and the discretionary capacity of the mind also goes at this point, but a bundle of tendencies, or vasanas, remains.

				 				Such beings exist now not on the basis of discretion or conscious volition but on the basis of their tendencies, which buffet them about without any volition on their part. Since they are ruled only by tendencies at this point, the karma takes much longer to work itself out.

				Basically, this means that if you function unconsciously, your karma rules you absolutely. As soon as you function with some awareness, the power of karma over your life weakens. In life beyond the body, discretion does not exist, so karma rules absolutely. If you have pleasant karma within you, it gets magnified, and if you have unpleasant karma within you, it gets intensified. It is these internal conditions that are referred to as heaven and hell in many traditions.

				This is why it is so important to address your karma when you are in the embodied state. At this point, you can work out in ten years what might take a hundred years in the disembodied condition.

				Even today, there are tendencies that are pushing and pulling you. This is why the word responsibility is so important. It is your responsibility to exercise the choice every moment of your life: either to follow your tendency or to make a conscious decision. If you live with this sense of responsibility, your tendencies will not rule you, and your future will not mimic the past.

				There is much terror in the world around the idea of ghosts. Since the Allotted Karma is still strong, their presence is felt a little more strongly for a little while. The more sensitive may be able to sense this. But there is nothing to fear about their presence. Think of a ghost simply as a person, like you, who happened to lose their body. You are also a ghost, but with a body. Not much of a difference, really! A ghost with a body can cause much harm, as you know, but a ghost without a body has meager capabilities.





Karma and Memory Loss


				Modern medicine has made it possible for us to live longer than a previous generation could have ever imagined. This is wonderful. However, to lengthen the life of the physical body without taking care of the karmic fiber is lopsided development. We now have a certain mastery over biochemistry and are capable of using medicine and surgery to prolong the life span. But the rub is that modern medicine knows nothing about karma.

				This is one of the reasons for the upswing in the number of older people losing their mental faculties. The hardware is fortified and strengthened, but no software exists. This is like having a “dumb” computer, capable of existing in its materiality, but incapable of functioning.

				The advances in medicine are not to be derided. Much has been achieved. However, without new karmic substance, the body is an empty shell. Even if you replace a heart, a kidney, hips, shoulders, elbows, and every other moving part in the body and create a new bionic individual, the human being cannot function without karma.

				If our pursuit of external science and technology were accompanied by a pursuit of inner well-being, this would be less of an issue. But enhancing the physical without finding access to the nonphysical dimension is the fundamental problem.

				Once you know how to open up the warehouse of Accumulated Karma (sanchita), you will actually be able to generate more than enough software. Even if your physical body were to endure for a thousand years, you would not lose your mind, because there would be software enough to sustain it.

				If you cultivated the spiritual life, you would have another option, too. Once your software starts diminishing, you would have the freedom and balance to know when to shed your hardware. In other words, you would know when and how to walk out of the physical body. You would exit before you are evacuated.





Samadhi: Reaching the Summit


				For the yogic practitioner, as the intensity of practice increases, the energies start moving upward. Now the contact with the physical body becomes minimal. If this goes beyond a certain point, the person attains what is known as samadhi.

				Sama means equanimous, and dhi refers to the intellect. When you reach an absolutely equanimous state of intellect in which you are unable to distinguish between the concepts of you and the other; this and that; here and there, you have reached a state of samadhi. A mirror simply reflects everything. Nothing sticks to it; no residue is left upon it, and it never makes any judgment about what it reflects. It does not discriminate between pleasant and unpleasant, beautiful and ugly. When your mind becomes like this, you are in a state of samadhi. When all these distinctions drop away, the life energy no longer clings to the body. At this point, it starts dislodging itself from the physical.

				If you remain in this condition for an extended period of time, you could well slip out of the body. This is why people in these conditions are kept protected in spiritual communities. This protection is necessary because the slightest jolt or pinprick to the system can make people in these states leave their physical bodies for good. They are so much on edge and their contact with the body is so fragile that this is a very real possibility.

				While many have exited their body in such a state, other yogis want to root themselves in the body and still experience the freedom of not being in it. This balance was required when I needed to do a certain kind of energy work. In order to consecrate the Dhyanalinga, I needed people around me who could be intensely active and meditative at the same time. This is a rare combination because when energies are rooted in the body, you are fit for survival but not for transformation. When your energy contact with the body is minimal, you can transform rapidly, but survival is precarious.

				 				What makes transformation so rapid when energy contact with the body is minimal?

				Essentially, the fact that your energies become very fluid. Now you can take your life from one dimension to another with ease. It is like the earthen pot that I mentioned earlier: it becomes rigid once the clay is burned. Karma is similar. It is so deeply imprinted on the physiological, psychological, and energetic levels that it keeps manifesting itself in a million different ways. It has backup systems everywhere. So if you want to unburn the earthen pot and make it a malleable ball of clay again, you have to do some intense energy work.

				During the Dhyanalinga consecration, we had people whose physical contact was so minimal that it was almost like having pure clay again. Now the options are many: you can make ten pots into one big pot, or you can make twenty-five pots out of them! So when energies are so malleable and fluid that they are no longer stuck to one particular form, it allows for several transformational and creative possibilities.

				For the yogi, the ultimate aim is mahasamadhi, or ultimate dissolution of the limited identity. This means a voluntary relinquishment of the physical, mental, and energy bodies. There is nothing life-denying about this. It is instead about giving up the limited for the unlimited. You could think of it like this: Instead of sitting on the beach, you choose to become the ocean. You choose to move from limited pleasure to the unfathomable ecstasy of boundless existence.

				 				A yogi of great accomplishment will dissolve most of his karmic load, keeping a small volume that can be worked out just before his final exit. However, there are also yogis who walk the path of love and devotion—or bhakti, as it is called. Such people are able to leave through the sheer intensity of their emotion. Such people have not dissolved all their karma; indeed, their longing is itself a deep karma. The intensity of their emotion, however, enables them to distance themselves from their karma.

				When such a person attains mahasamadhi, the karmic structure will endure for a while without any etheric or bliss body inside. It is like an empty shell. This karmic shell will fall apart in time, although it sometimes needs to be broken to hasten the process.





Avadhutas: Beings of Bliss


				The purpose of yoga is to open up various spaces within you that are not you. Initially, this dimension of not you may be just a speck. Gradually, as you nurture it with practice or start clearing karmic debris, this space starts expanding. A day comes when this space occupies everything within you.

				That is when we can say you have become truly meditative. You are now in a state of equanimity—of samadhi—when the dance of duality no longer touches you. You can play the external game if you want. Otherwise, internally, you are fine just as you are. You are not identified with the game of me and you anymore.

				Those whose limited identifications have dropped away so completely that they are unable to function in the outside world are known as avadhutas in Sanskrit. Avadhutas are mystics who have journeyed so far beyond worldly consciousness that they turn utterly childlike. They are sometimes even perceived as crazy. They have dropped the intellect so completely that they do not know how to survive in the outside world and have to be looked after.

				 				Such internal states may not last forever, but they do last for lengths of time, sometimes for years. These are blissful and wonderful states, but social situations need to be supportive for people in such conditions, because they cannot look after themselves. Traditionally, however, such people were celebrated in India. There have been avadhutas all over the country, wonderful beings who have been revered for centuries after their time.

				For small periods of time, it is good for people to go into these states. It is a bit like sweeping the lowest floor of your karmic structure. It takes enormous awareness to reach so deep within yourself and undertake such cleaning. But in this kind of state, one can reach the bottom very easily. An avadhuta is in such a state of bliss that they have no karma, no bondage, and everything is naturally cleaned up for them. So yogis sometimes remain in such states for periods because it is the quickest path to liberation.

				However, at the time of leaving the body, a yogi will emerge from this state. This is because it takes awareness to relinquish the body. The key thing is to leave the body in a state of consciousness, without creating further karma.





Retaining the Body After Bursting the Karmic Bubble


				How do enlightened beings survive? Is it possible to retain the physical body after breaking the karmic bubble? Is it possible to live after burning up all one’s karma?

				It is, but it takes engineering. Since enlightened beings no longer have a karmic footprint, it is very difficult for them to retain a physical form. Yogis have various tricks to accomplish this. One option is to perform conscious karma to retain the body. Many mystics down the ages have done this. Otherwise, the temptation to leave the body is very strong once the karmic bubble has burst.

				 				Different yogis have created different methods. Many have maintained some simple conscious attachments: either toward a spiritual mission or toward food. These are simple desires that they can drop at any time. Those around them have often been confounded by their behavior. How could someone so spiritually elevated be attached to something so worldly? But it is usually a conscious need to create karma in order to retain the physical body.

				Soon after the consecration of the Dhyanalinga, my energy body was severely damaged. I had used it intensely and freely, and it was unfit to continue life in any way. Medically, I was a walking disaster. Lumps would manifest in different parts of my body, but ten days later they would be gone. I would go for a blood test one day, and doctors would diagnose various bizarre diseases. But a month later, there would be no evidence of these. I was doing my best to restore the energy body, but I also sought medical diagnoses to find out the extent of physical damage.

				There is no way I could have sustained my life at this time had I not linked my energy body to the energy systems of some other beings. I seldom talk about the details because it would sound like some fairytale. But I mention this here to give you a sense of just how sophisticated the entire science of the energy body is.

				Existentially, no distinction exists between the life of one being and that of another. But physically and mentally, there is, of course, separateness. By linking the two on an energy level, you can create a certain life support system for yourself. That is what I did until I fixed my physical body. It took me a long time, because I maintained a hectic work schedule through it all.

				 				Mixing up one’s life energies with those of others is a way of extending one’s life or else of averting certain karmic events. In the first six months of 2005, for instance, it was clear to me that I would have a major injury in my right shoulder. This was not an injury that could be avoided by being careful. It was an inevitability. By mixing my energy body with those of others, however, I was able to confuse the karmic process, as it were, and avert it.

				It is possible to extend the human form for a very long time if one knows how. The East is replete with stories of yogis who have lived for hundreds of years. These are dismissed as exaggerations today, but a very authentic arcane science of longevity makes this possible. The question, however, is, Why extend human life for no reason? It requires much manipulation of life energy, which incurs its own share of karma. It is not advisable to meddle with life on that level unless there is a specific purpose for it.

				There is a well-known incident of a mystic who sat and meditated on the banks of the river Ganga in India. One day, there was a flood. He continued to meditate and was buried under the earth. Six months later, when cultivators were plowing the land, they accidentally hit his head. His head was wounded and started bleeding. Amazed, they dug farther and found the meditating yogi. He simply got up and walked away.

				Now, this yogi was “hibernating” underground in an altered state of consciousness in order to extend his life. He knew his physical body had come to its end. At the same time, certain karmic bondages remained. He did not want to give up the physical body and return once more in another lifetime to work out his karma. So he decided to extend his life for a while so he could finish his Allotted Karma once and for all.





Systems of Energy Healing


				Energy healing systems have grown very popular in the world today. My own take on them is unambiguous. While the intention to help others is a laudable one, it is juvenile to think that you can heal someone else because you have learned to harness a little energy in your hands.

				What most people do not realize is that when you heal, you are only appeasing the karmic effect. You do not have the capability to take away the cause. If you merely remove the effect, the cause will take effect in some other way.

				Let us say someone has asthma. That is their karma. As a healer, you lay your hands on them. You may be successful in removing the asthma. Now the asthma is gone, but the cause is not gone. It may manifest itself in some other way. It could become an accident or a heart attack. So do not ever seek to remove the effect. The effect is only an indicator of a problem; by merely erasing it, you are only enabling the seeds of the problem to manifest in some other way.

				When there is pain in the body, for instance, it is an indicator that something is wrong. Pain is an opportunity to bring awareness to your system so you can investigate what is wrong. But if you simply pop a painkiller without attending to the cause, the mainspring of the ailment will keep growing, and one day it will strike even harder.

				The only way to remove a cause is to take it upon your system. There was a time when I was doing this because the people I wanted to do some intense energy work with were stuck in certain cycles. Those two years, I was a very sick man. One day I would have an illness; the next day I would be completely healthy. One moment I would be all right; the next moment I would be so ill that people would think I was about to die. These fluctuations happened simply because I was throwing my life energy around liberally to create a certain basis for the work I was doing.

				 				But today, it is only on rare occasions that I do this. I intervene only if I see that the person has dropped every identification and has only some small, niggling karmic issues left. This intervention is just to give them the needed push toward their destination. Otherwise, as a guru, I never interfere with the karmic process. I simply help hasten it.

				I have pointed out the dangers of working with energy to any number of self-professed healers. Many who have looked closely at this work have given it up. Those for whom it is a lucrative livelihood have continued. If you are offering psychological solace to people, it is fine. But if you are healing people so that their ailments are actually going away, it is dangerous.

				I invite healers to observe their patients. They will find that anywhere between six months to two and a half years, their patients will go through some other upheaval in their lives. It will not stop there. If the first upheaval hits them in the first eight months, the next will come within the next three years. If this second upheaval hits them within the next three years, the next will come within five and five and a half years. If you look out for the dates, you will see that these upheavals will occur with almost mathematical precision. But if the first upheaval hits them within three months, it will rapidly work itself out over the next three years.

				There are various patterns to these upheavals. When I meet someone who is going through an upheaval right now, it is not difficult for me to know when it is going to hit them again. I do not predict doom for them, of course. Instead, I might say “Why don’t you meditate?” Or “Why don’t you do some hatha yoga?” If you do some spiritual practice, you can handle the problem from within and minimize its impact upon you.

				 				You will also find that if you try healing others, within nine to eleven months much suffering will come to you. The suffering need not be in the form of physical calamities. It could be psychological as well. Now, if your attitude is one of absolute equanimity—“It doesn’t matter to me, even if tragedies strike”—go ahead with your healing. But don’t forget you are catalyzing calamities for the other person as well!

				Also, what you might see as mere pain in someone else is also sometimes fuel to help them grow. It is unfortunate that many people lead frivolous and superficial lives until their lives are touched by pain. Do not think you are always helping them by alleviating it. Instead, help them go beyond it.

				The ultimate guidance you can offer is to help someone transcend their suffering. This is what the great sages and mystics down the ages have done. They remind the world that there is a way out of suffering. Even if there is pain, there need be no suffering. The ability to see this difference is the supreme human attainment.

				It may seem cruel, but it is actually the best thing that you can do for another. Why? Because you are offering them not temporary relief, but a permanent solution.

				Many people who follow some spiritual practices gain small capabilities, such as the ability to heal or tell the future. But these are of no spiritual consequence. In the higher-level meditation programs I conduct, some people are able to acquire certain supernormal powers, or siddhis, as we call them in Sanskrit. However, as soon as I see these powers, I push them back immediately, even if doing so disturbs a person’s trajectory of growth.

				 				As a guru, I do not support siddhis. I destroy them. I am not interested in miracles. I put a halt to such capabilities right away because if a person acquires these powers, they will no longer pursue the spiritual path. They will set up their circus, try to make some money or acquire fame, and make a business out of it.

				Do not try to become a franchisee for cosmic energy. And do not try to become a miracle worker. My only aim is to help you recognize the miracle of the life that you are. Everything else is a distraction.





SADHANA


					It is important to remind yourself as often as possible that everything you consider to be yourself is an acquired identity.

					One simple way to approach this realization is to make sure you are physically exhausted every night before you head off to bed. You will always sleep well and deeply. Many superfluous ideas about yourself will fall away, and so sleep of this kind can also be karmically rejuvenating.

					But there is a more conscious exercise you could perform. Every night, sit on your bed, preferably cross-legged, with your eyes closed. Remind yourself that all memory is accumulation. Everything about you is acquired: your ideas of nationality, race, religion, all your relationships of like and dislike, love and hate.

					Slowly, gently, start setting aside everything with which you have a relationship. This could mean setting aside people, as well as your material possessions. Remind yourself that even your body is an accumulation.

					 					Imagine that you are on your deathbed and that you are going to die in two minutes. Put away everything that is not you—your sensations, thoughts, and emotions. See your sleep as impending death. You may feel a certain fear and struggle within you initially. But it will pass. Leave your body sitting and simply lie back with your eyes closed. Go to bed like this.

					If you do this each night, a great deal of karma can be worked out each night. If you fall asleep as if you’re dying, you will see that your karma barely has any impact on you. You will find over time that you are moving from compulsive behavior to a conscious existence.

					You will be reborn daily.





